Gary payton Bruce bowen Doug christie Kevin garnett D howard 
Thanks! 
You sound a lot like my best friend. He also has PTSD from his time served in Iraq. He is currently trying EMDR but to no avail. This, the Psychiatrists think, is to do with apparent 'Asperges Syndrome'. My question is, do you believe that the EMDR will cure you instantly, like they claim it will, as my friend sure as hell does not think so.  (Also, I've seen what PTSD has done to him so my heart really goes out to you and I hope that one day you will be cleared of this horrific affliction)
Don't stop shooting film! :-(   You can always replace the camera with something like one of those Olympus OM cameras which are pretty compact with razor sharp lenses that are pretty affordable on used market.   If size is a concern and you absolutely have to go digital, I would look into the upcoming Fuji X-Pro 1 camera. It's not a DSLR, as it doesn't have a rotating mirror, but the sensor size and image quality are on par with a higher end DSLR. 
Go for a walk, it will be spring soon. Why would you want a girl like that in your life anyway! The future's so bright you gotta wear shades!
wouldn't the plectrum be white then? :)
You won't win. Apologize. Be the bigger person.  ...keep it in your back pocket, if you want, but it's your *mom*. They're gonna overreact.
Se han pasado remedos de propuestas, tipo la de pemex que fue una burla.
Oh Ok. Thought we were doing OK with lube if it didn't hurt. Good to know. Thanks!
The section on sleep bums me out. Due to full time work and school I get maybe 5-6 hours of sleep at most. Maybe he was just lying about lack of sleep affecting weight loss? Right?.... right?
You're going to start a civil war in this subreddit :P
It's not that folks in Mississippi are bored of travel. It's just that their cars wouldn't make it past state lines. 
YEP
Sweet! so first, I made a MAJOR mistake with my first purchase. SO I was thinking the best things to buy to get started, In addition to deck-building, and how different types compare to each-other. I also have this card called sundial of the infinite, that confuses me to oblivion. I think I understand the rules.
I need too play that game.
Great, now you'll never get that smell off of the fish.
upboat for the Ocean's 11 reference.  Also, I'm a chick, and I worked in auto repair for about 3-4 years (oil changes, tires, ect., but still a muscle car gearhead). I've had several men walk into the shop who demanded that I do not touch their vehicles b/c I'm female. Ah yes, I forgot. In being born with a penis, you have some instinctual mechanical aptitude that my years of study and experience did not earn me. Silly female me.
"drifting" changed my feelings on the acoustic guitar forever.
Horn tooted.
Uuuuh alright I guess..
I always thought Caldwell was the most stoic. Although sometimes I can't even be sure he has a pulse.
I don't think there's anything that woman could look good in, besides a blimp costume.
Post to /r/personalfinance; they have lots of good advice for managing debt and collections. You're very right to be cautious--it's really easy to do something wrong that could hurt your credit badly.
Hell, I sell cars and with some of the dill holes.... er...., fine fine folks that is.... who come in (you know the type, the ones you have to constantly tell 'no, you cannot drive the Raptor just because you were looking at a Ranger, so stop asking), a chance for some mayhem on a test drive would be a welcome respite. Of course, I would then turn on the person I drove there, just because. 
Its not entirely subconscious.  I don't see things in clouds unless I'm looking to see something in the clouds.  There's also no reason why you should adhere to what the mind tries to do or make sense of with photography.  Photography is the art of making visual observations and there is no right or wrong way to do that.  This photo is very appealing and I wouldn't change a thing about the focus. If you want an emotional interpretation of the image, have you ever looked at lips you wanted to kiss, but were unable to?  For me that same feeling is evoked through this image.  If the focus was shifted to the eyes it would be an entirely different image, and probably less interesting since I've seen that hundreds of times.  The only place these critiques would apply is if either the client (if there even is one) didn't like the image, but I don't think that has anything to do with the photograph itself.
By that logic, if someone feels obligated to help their friend move, then said friend is guilty of slavery.  IMO, it depends on why they feel obligated.  If they feel obligated because they think some unlawful harm (violence, economic harm) will befall them if they don't give in, then that could be coercive.  If they feel obligated simply because they think they owe their partner or don't want to make their partner unhappy (not because of fear), then I say they've made a free choice.  You're not entitled to your partner's happiness or affection, so if your SO pouts after you refuse sex with him/her, I don't think that's enough to compel you to do something you don't want to do.  That's the consequence of your choice, but it doesn't rob you of free choice.   You are entitled to be free from violence, so if violence is threatened then you are being compelled against your will.  The consequences in such circumstances are unlawful and unreasonable, so it does rob you of free choice.
Explain a scenario in which Russia gets its troops to the continental US in any significant numbers.  (Modern Warfare II doesn't count as a citation.)
'Ey up, WoW Europe player here, what's this?
I see I'm not raging anymore I just looked at BestOfTribunal subreddit and lolled a lot. Thank you for the info.
P = NP **[PROOF]**
I love this theory. It makes so much sense that ~~I~~ he would be cut off or possibly even killed by the violence. Oh goodness that's a dark thought.
Ready and waiting.
I thought the chef was just "The swedish chef". He has a name?!
Casablanca.   ...I'm terrible at this kind of thing. 
GJ guy, u r a credit to the human race
marry.  me.  please.
I think since birth. Seriously just to visit others. Dont jinx me
What constitutes the "top 3"? Sorry, I'm an ignorant civilian. Is it what you personally feel, as in, "I got this Kuwait Liberation medal and I busted my ass, but this Purple Heart I got from cutting my hand on a beer can."
Or as UCLA would say it:  Ching Chong Ling Long Ting Tong!!
Having moved from Central Maine to Burlington, VT to Seacoast, NH be aware that each region offers very different educational and employment opportunities. All great areas though. Do you have work lined up?
Key Chains. I have about 700 from nearly everywhere I have ever been that has any significance. Also, a bunch are random ones that people give me.
Doesn't matter, still collected
Personally, I think you should get the Water Jet Pack, but I don't know if it's worth shelling out 130,000. 
I like how he works at imgur but the imgur link he provided is broken. &amp;#3232;\_&amp;#3232;
Er ee er ee er ee er ee 
I'm not interested in how "snappy" a response is. I'll spell this out for you again very simply, because your intent on missing my point.  This man is innocent, he has not been proven guilty in a court of law. He has a right to a trial, and holding him indefinitely is illegal according to international law. The fact that some little armchair twerp from reddit can determine a man's guilt is hilarious, if it weren't so sad.  EDIT: I don't know why I'm even bothering to reply to a redditor with negative karma.
I know it's passe to post "This!"? But still...   **THIS**
Sac-rice-fied? Sacririced? Sacca-..sacca----sacca not gonna work here anymore.
Yeah, I found that out the hard way...bought a small bucket of pistachios as a healthy alternative to chips to snack on....they didn't last long.
Pictures offline. All I can find is [this](http://i.imgur.com/KoK9L.png).
The stuffed [James Randi dolls are actually old Darwin dolls](http://www.flickr.com/photos/smiteme/2607967919/) with handcuffs and stuff added. 
*It's an entirely different kind of gift.*
SCORPION KNIFE FIGHT!
My mom and sister are both nurses, and seem to love them... I've never understood it, but a redditor also says so, so it must confirm it.
Downvoted for using the improper way to host a video.
This.   The joy when you roll the first with homegrown!
Specifically, I dislike that people my age (mid-20s) have to maintain a presence on Facebook, or their friends really do forget to invite them to things.
As a society, we make decisions for the collectivity. We decide, for example, whether we want to keep women in the workforce (they're half the skill and manpower of the nation, I certainly hope that we do), and whether we want to encourage reproduction at least to reach population renewal (for economical reasons, we ought to want this very much). Once you have decided that these 2 things are important for a productive, well-functioning society, you implement tools to encourage them. Maternity leave is one of them.
Took a bit of work to clean the layer of dirt off it. Now testing it out with a bit of Augustus ;)
Oh wow! Thanks for all the help guys! Really appreciate it!  Well, I went to the game store and bought it. First and formost the game looks and sounds amazing! But..  I was hoping to kinda just pick it up and learn quick like how I did with SF4 and MvC3, but man is it hard to do combos! How fast am I suppose to input the commands (buttons?) i tried the tutorials and trials , but I just can't seem to get a combo done. It would ask me to do down.hk standing.hp and then a special move, but I could barely get to the second command! Yeah it's barely the first day, but is it always this hard to do a combo?  Tl;dr: how fast (or slow) am I suppose to input buttons for a combo??
Good to hear the downvotes were worth it. I just wish people would read posts before they vote on them... guess its time to unsubscribe to /r/askreddit and complete my stripping of the default subreddits.
It's just a bloody picture - who honestly pays ***that much*** attention to what goes up there at the top? Don't need to make it every single item of football news.
I guess I mean I suck at concentrating. And yeah it is speed too, mostly because I'll have to re-read sections over and over because I fail to process everything. My mind floats away.
I wish we had Crystal Edition...
I've got one of those that I took November 24th, apparently.  [Shot 1](http://imgur.com/ESFUC)  [Shot 2](http://imgur.com/K7w8Z)  (This was mincraft 1.0.0 so I'm not sure it'd still be there in the seed if you created the word now, plus it's far out)
&gt;(TVTropes)  Not enough for you? Okay then.
its the Tokyo Tower duhhh
I can target any silver and clad coin that is 3 or so inches deep and that's I've been testing on. 
This is T[he Frogman](http://thefrogman.me/private/341453886/tumblr_kwgo2j7nr71qzrlhg)!   He has some great stuff up that's well worth the look. 
Thanks for the suggestions!
It is possible to hear it, but than again I have a CSF pressure of 460 instead of the normal below 150.
wake n bake, noice
I generally don't refer to it as porn that "guys like."  But the poster brought in the issue of gender-specificity.  I was trying to emphasize the fact that I can find my own damn porn, and I stay away from any porn that markets itself as female-friendly.  I am just not interested. For you to jump on me for being sexist is pretty lame.  As you just said, when people say "female-specific" they DO mean softer and more romantic. And, for the record, I know there are a shit-ton of women who like the rougher stuff.  But THEY (we) are not the women being catered to with "female-friendly" porn.  It's like video games.  There are PLENTY of girl gamers who like traditional, mainstream video games.  But since a lot of girls don't like traditional video games, the developers have created a niche market, geared to appeal to females.  A lot of girl gamers probably stay away from those games, because they would rather play your normal, violent/graphic/creepy/whatever games.  That isn't sexism on the part of the girl gamers ... it is an understanding that that niche is not for them.
I have 2 of these little squeakers. Peruvian breed, so their hair is about 10" long. Always getting into trouble, but are too adorable to reprimand.
If liking guns is WTF material for you, you'll get a kick out of [/r/guns](/r/guns). 
Well I guess what I'm asking if she was is transmission likely or even possible?
[Loodie's cuticle care section](http://loodieloodieloodie.blogspot.com/search/label/Cuticle%20Care) is amazing. as soon as you get a hangnail, nip it off carefully to prevent further tearing and pain!
Which will blow up in their faces eventually, as who will replace the glut of working age individuals?  Is there any social infrastructure in place to take care of the soon-to-be graying majority?  What's happening in now Japan may be a microcosm of what China will have to address sooner rather than later.  
This.   All those people who complain when the price dips have the wrong mentality. Dips are simply buying opportunities to accumulate more silver. Before you start stacking, you need to ask yourself two important questions: *"How long do you intend to hold onto your silver?"* and *"Where do you see the price going during that time?"*   If you are like most silverbugs, the answers will be *"years"* and *"to the moon"* respectively. That being said, you want to accumulate as much as possible before it gets to your target price. The increase in silver prices means that you get FEWER ounces for your hard-earned Federal Reserve Notes.   Personally, I want the price of silver to crash to $1 so I can buy boxes and boxes of Canadian Maple Leaves and roll around in them, thinking about how rich I'll be when the price skyrockets up to the moon.
You must be thinking of Soviet Russia; this is America the Beautiful, Land of the Free, Home of the Brave!   *oh the irony...*
Girls who wear hoodies with a tear in the middle, the spandex pants, and the uggs. This is the sorority girl standard, and most of the time the girls wearing it are not attractive.
Go to Dollar Store buy a kitchen knife and mug someone with money
Guess not. :)
UK here, only those who roll their own do this. Normal, factory-made cigarettes are packed well enough, so no one taps them.
It's a Purp. And green Purp, the best colors. :] 
DC access is blocked over CU-Wireless and CU-Internet so people don't overload the already overloaded access points.  You can still access it if you plug in to an ethernet port or connect to a WiFi network that isn't CU-Wireless or CU-Internet
True, they screwed that one up, but they DID fix it by offering refunds and removing the DRM.
Like the change. Radius to small to justify getting before your nuke and wings imo.
As much as I love the man, I think this subreddit has enough Ron Paul news for me. I'll pass.
Brilliant!
I told my brother about the merits of the show. He said he'd put it on his list of shows to watch, after some shows he's catching up on (*Big Bang Theory* and *Community*, if I remember correctly).  And that's it. I don't bug him about it anymore. If he'll watch it, he'll get around to it. If not, oh well.  Don't ever "force" anyone into anything. It'll make them hate it more. And it edges uncomfortably close to cult-ish behavior.
Does the book of Mormon explain this or are these stories in it?:  Genesis 5:27 says Methuselah lived nine hundred and sixty nine years, which ended in the year of the flood. When we add up the genealogies found in other ancient texts from which the Old Testament is copied, we find that he lived well past the flood. Yet, the Bible tells us only eight people were saved from the flood and Methuselah was not one of them. Did Methuselah build his own boat and hide from the Holy Ghost? Or did the reporter get the wrong information and religious numbers from the Ghost - again? Or, from some other place? Which account is in error? Are both wrong? In Genesis 46:23, Dan is reported to have had one son. In just four generations, that family numbered sixty-two thousand, plus servants. If Dan had fifty sons and each son had three wives, he could not have made it. You figure it out, I can't. I don't understand religious numbers.
i don't think the community would be lost. speaking for myself, I see it as an opportunity to talk strategy/planning away from the friendly chatter that occurs in-game. i would definitely still use the in-game voice chat to socialize and converse with everyone.
Paul shouldn't even fucking mater, he has nothing to do with the entire rest of the new testament.
The original question, 'Why does Reddit keep upvoting Women Hating Bullshit'?  The examples I gave were of posts from people on reddit, each with 1000's of upvotes about how, 'their friend' was falsley accused of rape and how this is a travesty. Which if true it is.  The theme I am commenting on, and asking about, is why Reddit keeps upvoting these responses so heavily. It creates the impression that most women are just making it up.
You look great!
exactly what I was thinking
On a side note, one of the reason it was illegal was because the holes you reach into are going to be used to birth babies. At least that was the explanation given to me by the conservation department here in Missouri, where it is now legal in several bodies of water.
I hate to ask, but is there anyway you could put me in contact with your father?  I'd love to do a brief e-mail interview with him if possible.  
True, but I feel like seeing him anywhere besides Woodstock would still be a life changing event.  My only regret wouldn't be his possibly most famous concert, Woodstock.  And if I remember correctly, wasn't Woodstock one of the first shows for the Band of Gypsies?  Because I'm pretty sure Jimi corrected the announcer who still introduced them as the Jimi Hendrix Experience.
Do you also candidly think those who become upset at being groped by the TSA trivialize the experiences of people who were sexually abused? Do you think the way people talk about the TSA, and the emotions they have in response to it, somehow mocks the trauma of people who were sexually abused?  And note, this is actually an analogy that works, as both are serious invasions of privacy which are ostensibly done for the good of the public.
You can only buy it through the Humble Bundle website. You can buy the games separately on Steam, but not the bundle. 
2, 4 and 6 are my favs, with an emphasis on 2 because it's delightfully odd
Thanks.
what do you use to make maps like that
That article, is just a complilation of all the bad stereotypes people think of when they think of the computer "nerds". IT departments are constantly marginalized, and looked down upon by so many companies.  IT workers don't explain problems because when we do, we so often get berated with the user telling us they don't care why it stopped working and to do our job and fix it. We are regarded as the magical fix it department, and efforts to get error message numbers and specfic details of issues users are having are derided. I was insulted reading that article.
4-2 Buffalo
And trust me - a good fitting outfit on a man will not be too tight or make you look gay.
Hey! What about TPB? 
I am 15. How the hell is this about pedophilia?
Thanks for that!  My blind friend gave up on Reddit around the time 80% of links became JPGs.
Relax guys!  He doesn't *really* think all Americans are afraid of socialism,  that's just the opinion his government told him to have.
I was so disapointed with the XIII, but can't help but want it. I think I have an addiction.
Google translate tells me Abhcóide diabhail but there may be a better translation elsewhere.
Coolies, thanks for the feedback everyone. I hope to get the SO to MacGyver a DIY contraption to try out soon. I don't think I can hold out much longer!!!
I plan on applying as soon as/if I move out. I won't qualify if I'm still living at home. It's part of the reason that moving out would actually work IF my boyfriend had a job.
I would like to see a multiplier value (x2, x4, x8, x16) for anti-aliasing instead of an arbitrary low/med/high selection and the same for anisotrpoic filtering. Other than that, it's perfect.  EDIT: Oh, and I so hope they have DX10 support available as a choice.
samesies
&gt;instant trophy   LOL. Yeah, after I smurf on my alt account I hop in the SRS IRC and brag about how fucking awesome my find of someone being a bigoted piece of shit is, because we *love* *it* when someone is a complete and utter twat.
it's rhinestones, turquoise, and crosses all the way down
What guitars do you use?
so, How Bout Them Stamps?
Apparently they aren't real wolves: "fabricated from painted sheepskins and stuffed with hay and metal wires, with plastic lending contour to their faces and marbles for eyes." http://boingboing.net/2006/09/05/cai-guoqiangs-flying.html
Government mandate is force. A gun pointed to a person's head is a valid way of illustrating such force. If you refuse to comply with government taxation, and refuse to go to court with it, at some point or other a gun will be pointed at your head. It's a way of looking at the reality of the situation, not just being dramatic.
Depends who you ask. I used to be at 800 elo 8 months ago(2 months before s1 ended). I almost wanted to quit the game because of how people would always call me bad and rage at me when I fuck up. However, I didnt. Instead, I worked on getting better and now I'm almost 1800 elo. What I love about games at this elo is that almost NO ONE EVER RAGES. I'm finding the games at this elo incredibly fun(especially when the games are really close). Like PutBoy says, this elo is like elo heaven
FAP FAP FAP FAP FAP FAP FAP FAP FAP FAP FAP FAP FAP FAP FAP FAP FAP FAP FAP FAP FAP FAP FAP FAP FAP FAP FAP FAP FAP FAP FAP FAP FAP FAP FAP FAP FAP FAP FAP FAP FAP FAP FAP FAP FAP FAP FAP FAP FAP FAP FAP FAP FAP FAP FAP FAP FAP FAP FAP FAP FAP FAP FAP FAP FAP FAP FAP FAP FAP FAP FAP FAP FAP FAP FAP FAP FAP FAP FAP FAP FAP FAP FAP FAP FAP FAP FAP FAP FAP FAP FAP FAP FAP FAP FAP FAP FAP FAP FAP FAP FAP FAP FAP FAP FAP FAP FAP FAP FAP FAP FAP FAP FAP FAP FAP FAP FAP FAP FAP FAP FAP FAP FAP FAP FAP FAP FAP FAP FAP FAP FAP FAP FAP FAP FAP FAP FAP FAP FAP FAP FAP FAP FAP FAP FAP FAP FAP FAP FAP FAP FAP FAP FAP FAP FAP FAP FAP FAP FAP FAP FAP FAP FAP FAP FAP FAP FAP FAP FAP FAP FAP FAP FAP FAP FAP FAP FAP FAP FAP FAP FAP FAP FAP FAP FAP FAP FAP FAP FAP FAP FAP FAP FAP FAP FAP FAP FAP FAP FAP FAP FAP FAP FAP FAP FAP FAP FAP FAP FAP FAP FAP FAP FAP FAP FAP FAP FAP FAP FAP FAP FAP FAP FAP FAP FAP FAP FAP FAP FAP FAP FAP FAP FAP FAP FAP FAP FAP FAP FAP FAP FAP FAP FAP FAP FAP FAP FAP FAP FAP FAP FAP FAP FAP FAP FAP FAP FAP FAP FAP FAP 
That's good. You must be very forgiving and have a big heart!
My friends and I just made up a religious joke. *evolution* That was all we could come up with though, sacrilegious jokes are just so easy.
Awwww. The truther returns and thinks his insanity is normal. 
Truely amazing, thank you!
I did not know that.
How big are you wanting to print this? Because any larger than a little 4x6 or something similar, a source image that small will look like crap blown up. 
And again, the issue is people being forced into an overpriced meal plan and then getting no choices of food that the want.   With the money I was forced to spend on a meal plan I could have gone to chipotle and kanes every lunch and supper (or any other places). Both of those are far superior to UDS.  With that said, if people are forced to eat UDS, they damn well better be getting at least one option for each meal that they want to eat. 
Hilarious
Yes :( freaking Gronk... I really don't like bros but he looks pretty fine. 
I don't know. The people who actually used the term were from Tokyo and LA (he found Kyopo offensive) specifically. Neither seemed sympathetic to NK to me. They were both in their early 30s not old like some people suggested here.
There are four possible outcomes, actually.  Besides the choices you are given, there's a "Best" and a "Worst" outcome.
[yo dawg](http://imgur.com/10KLo)
Thanks for the tipp! I've dug deep into my calves with my thumbs when massaging them, it was fucking horrid. But whatever makes the pain go away quicker. I hate not being able to extend my legs fully because of that.
Originally le in rage-anese was meant to be put in front of a troll verb.  Example: hot dog --&gt; *le slip* --&gt; hot dog on the floor. But now everyone puts it in front of every noun despite no one liking it.
I guess my main point is that regardless of how many details you give us, we can't really help you. Your school has a faculty and staff system set up to help you. Try talking to anyone who will give you a meeting (a friendly email does wonders with most faculty, they really do want to know their students). If faculty doesn't work, try going to anyone at all who might be able to help you, even the school councelors might be able to get you some attention. Try not to panic and instead focus some of your energy on fixing the situation by talking to people that have the power to help you. 
I have personally never used them but I'l share what I know. Most of them DO WORK. But only use them at stores like wal-mart and target. Also be safe. If a coupon is for over 10$ off they will need to override it on selfcheckout machines. and if the total savings is over 20$ they will need to override each additional coupon. Also if confronted just say that you won the coupon in a online survey and that you knew it was "too good to be true" . Dont let them keep the coupon if they think it is fake because then they can collect more fake ones(post them in their crew room) and it will ruin it for everyone. The crazy ass free coupons and ones for over 100 off will work but good luck convincing the clerk to scan it. 
I don't know the science, but aren't you sticking to the assumption that the body becomes no more efficient at reducing BAC as tolerance rises?  Also, he may have drunk a gallon in a day, but he probably vomited some of that up undigested.
To be fair, his username is a little more appropriate...
Baseballs from different stadiums. My dad and I actually have gone to ever stadium within the past 6 years or so by going on a mini road trip each summer. At every stadium I buy a cheap novelty ball from the shop. Add that to the foul ball I (finally) caught at a game, as well as a ball I used all the time growing up, and I have a pretty cool collection. Plus it's a nice memory of the games I went to with my dad.
I've only listened to it a few times so far and it's growing on me. But I can listen to Hissing Fauna non-stop and never get tired of it. 
If they could capture that properly on film, with a whole district 9 feel with the whole style of filming, than I think it would be a great movie.
And praise be to Allah for that.
You have our love! nice pictures!
supercillious  Prounounced: super-silly-us  Which, coincidentally, pretty much matches the word's definition:  http://www.merriam-webster.com/dictionary/supercilious
that's just all kinds of retarded. surely i get you weren't helped by the e-cig (which thousands of people are, including myself)...but you totally shat all over your point by the comparison. if anything the normal cigarette is crack and the e-cig is the coke.
http://www.cracked.com/article_19323_6-movie-tv-universes-that-overlap-in-mind-blowing-ways.html  Read #5, He was also in St. Elsewhere and since that famously ended when the whole show was revealed to take place in the imagination of an autistic child, then the last five minutes of St. Elsewhere is the only television show, ever. Everything else is a daydream.
*mindblown*
why would you feel like this..most of the atheist here on reddit are a bunch of 15 year olds who dont understand atheism and just talk shit to theist....---by your trusty neighborhood non religious person guy thing stuff blah blah blah..lol
Please add five sample questions.
And once you learn to read peoples body language learn to use the force Luke. - https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Neuro-linguistic_programming
It's definitely worth a read, I'm about halfway through. It's very interesting. I just asked because there is a section on language that reminded me of what you where saying. 
I think you're right about the need for more productive criticism. However, I'd be a bit reluctant to say it is just a matter of budget. More so with female fashion than male even, low cost outfits can be had that look great. It is more a matter of understanding how different cuts of clothing work or don't work, and how layers can do wonders to making something that would otherwise be questionable look quite presentable. It's a matter of discouraging things like tight on tight with hulking boots; things that are almost always going to look terrible regardless of age or budget.  But you're right, I think there is a lot of room for applying advice to a broad range of in styles in fashionable ways. Just, as a community, it has to be understood that there is a difference between having "unique" style and missing out on having a reasonable style completely.
For the Indians - Kipnis will hit the ground running, Chisenhall will come up and find his stride, and Pestano will show why he's the future Cleveland closer.
I OHP my drink. No one is impressed.
Go for the anus.
It's a new lap record!
Makes me instantly think of Hank Hill.
That 1/7 score just takes any enjoyment out of that video.
Cure for Type 1 Diabetes
Windows/Linux box here.  I STILL haven't found a suitable flash handler for Ubuntu. I have to switch to Windows to do anything..
What?
That's very cool indeed!
So, how was the first year of law school?  I see your legal writing class went well. Don't be that guy. Write a normal people letter.
You should label it Western Schism to avoid confusion.  http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Western_schism
can someone explain this like i'm 5?  &gt;Indices of hedge-fund returns overstate the numbers because of factors such as “survivor bias” (poor performers stop reporting their numbers) and “backfill bias” (only successful newcomers start to report). These effects could add 3-5 percentage points a year to average returns.
Yeah I definitely see what you're saying. There's no reason to make things harder on yourself by picking a weird name if you don't have to.
I guess the graphics really do add 10 pounds. 
I hate the way asians cut chickens. that is, with no regard to the bones. 
I'm not sure they deserve to have their lives unruined.
NOOOO!!!!  It's been a few months since I last lost :(
It's lack of googly eyes frightens me bc I don't know what he or she is thinking.
[Orite.](http://conservativethinkers.net/wp-content/uploads/2011/08/smiling-dog.jpg)
i just pictured it like a horse-snail...
I can hear you typing scumbag !  Sincerely   your downstairs neighbor.
You can do side bends or sit ups but please don't lose that butt.
I'll run with it, cheers man
Has he tried to meet people through an online dating service?  If no, why not?  I answered a woman's "man wanted ad" in the newspaper and we've been married 10 years in April.
**LOOKS LEGIT**
This is fucking disgusting.  Anyone know what kind of animals they are?
We do not forgive you, you limey bastard.
Sorry, a little confusion on my part. I see what you mean now.  But of course, you're just saying that people aren't infallible. That, even if they think they're working towards their best self interest it's not necessarily so, (according to some measure). But now, the market process is the only thing that will put an adequate pressure on people to make the best decisions. Everything the government does is already in response to market demand. It can very well do those things by itself.  That people have such faith in government proves of course that they're irrational and need the market ;)
Yes, they had up to 5.5 bar of boost (72 psi on some) and produced huge power in qualifying trim. Some had up to 1400 hp. They usually ran on &gt;84% methyl benzene (toluene) to combat knock - even though they had very low compression (often &lt;8:1).
If you last more than a couple minutes (max) I congratulate you. That is all.
Hmm, eh, what the heck... not needing many, just to finish up a few incompletes... Mickey Mouse The Great Circus Mystery (SNES) Sunset Riders (SNES) Super Metroid (SNES) Zelda II (NES)
What is Jax's connection to ASOIAF? There are a lot of weapons masters in the series, but I can't think of a particular one that resembles him. 
So we've come to the conclusion that people are fucked up, not ideologies or religions.
BUT HESUS, ON DA CROSS. SO.... BRAVE.....
The DEA is trying to bust people who post their smoke spots on r/trees
Yeah, I was referring to room temperature, not cellar. Since it's a safe assumption that most closets are not at cellar temperature. You still require a higher CO2 PSI.
No. Deciding you have more of a right to something without working for it is the theists game, not mine.
I love mixed chocolate. 
Excuse me? This goes against everything I have learned in my bio degree so far. All life has a single common ancestor. If you think two mammals do not have a common ancestor, then honky, you be tripping.
I disagree. People that are fans of "real" djs are usually other djs. Fans usually don't know dick about djing, equipment, or platform used.
YOU TAKE MY FRIES BUT I'LL TAKE YOUR THIRST
Except for, you know, the entire opening song?!
And right next to it...
Please add five sample questions.
photobucket.com/nooccupy  These are my photos from the event
this is how i build normally, though theyre rarely ever competitive  not that i cant obtain the cards, i just like building decks out of cards i can get in bulk
Hey Andy, I must say that you music has influenced me the most out of all the music I've listened to/ deciphered! Please tell us the story behind Nakagawa-san!
While working as a national park ranger, My dad wrestled with a deer in an attempt to get his (the deers) antlers free from some fencing, when he was finally cut loose, he died of exhaustion.... Oh and he (my dad) completed ranger school. 
Stop right there criminal scum, pay the court a fine or serve your sentence, Your stolen sound files are now forfeit
A toss up between Code Geass and Death Note, both series had so many amazing twists and turns, they always kept you on the edge of your seat, but it can't be enjoyed as much when you know what's going to happen.
Very cute :)
Skipping past the condescending parts of that last message... are you actually familiar with Esperanto?  Here's one resource you can use at least: [Esperanto-English Dictionary on Project Gutenberg](http://www.gutenberg.org/ebooks/16967) by C. F. Hayes and J. C. O'Connor  More dictionaries, ebooks, etc. can be found in the links of this subreddit --&gt;
Objectified 2009 
I had been a long time lurker and made this account to post something on this sub reddit. With your support I came out of the stable but that wasn't exactly a 'front page' worthy post or anything. Sadly, a lot of people get beat out when they try to post something new. Such as when they find new art that they want to post someone might beat them to it. So they don't bother posting, which I cannot blame them for (no need to see the same piece of art 7 times in the new tab). But because of this a lot of new members get scared off and don't know what to post. I'm sure I read it in the other comments that a lot of people post Memes and such because they don't know what to post. I agree with that. I posted a screen cap of the latest two episodes because I found it funny and wanted to contribute to the community. I felt that was the best way but it seems I may be wrong. I really enjoy this subreddit but this post has scared me a little of posting anything further.
What if looking "NORMAL" isn't a priority to me? 
Shoulders look a little big. They're causing a bit of an over hang of fabric on the arms.
From my favorite sushi joint (Love Boat), here in North County San Diego.
Better hurry, there's only 5 left in stock
It's, there ain't no good chain gang.
possible reasons: territory, close to it's nest, got scared away.
Surprisingly, only about [210](http://www.reddit.com/r/AskReddit/search?q=rescued+cat).
Price of Freedom is fantastic. 
I'm not sure. I've seen a few thousand. Maybe ten thousand, but I'm not really sure. I don't think there's a chart that shows which account has the most negative amount of comment karma.
Of course they aren't, but this kind of construction is beyond the scope of what a rage comic is. That's like me criticizing an adviceanimal for not bringing a proper political argument. The shit is silly, who the fuck cares if it's based in reality? 
why has no one said pool table?
"Good girl."
Yeah, I'm a jewish atheist, who has no problem with religion as long is it isn't used to hurt another person, physically or mentally.
My mother told me the same thing growing up...so...I think you're lying!
This looks to be a fairly basic check-list app with a somewhat clunky web 1.5 interface that all in all is little more then a front for an Amazon web store.  I'll stick to geargrams for the time being.
The world hasn't ended for about 4.6 billion years... I think that the universe is on your side on this one.  Jokes aside, I get a good bit of existential anxiety when I think about the cosmos as well.  When you get worried, stop what you're doing and and realize that the world never ended for every single person who has ever lived. The universe is generally an okay and stable place, the earth probably isn't going anywhere for a good while.  Look up some breathing exercises for relaxation. Diaphragmatic breathing is a great way to calm yourself down. Also I find chewing gum or having a piece of candy is enough to pull your thoughts away from your own head.
you sell these? I buy some?
Hitting the front page is not enough to upset you [PROOF]
Stockbroker if you would.  I gave mine away LONG ago, but that is before i knew they'd introduce the Phlog and make me play pyro and giggle like a homosexual british schoolboy.
I have been lurking on Reddit for about a year now, and I can fairly say I have read my fair share of comments. Never, good sir, have I read a comment that has made me laugh out loud more than this one. Bravo.
The thing about gold is that everyone needs it, it doesnt really matter who gets it because 25 gold will not change the game for you, the more important part of getting the ward is the denial of vision and the fact you can later make plays on it.
it is the largest living thing on the planet, we are also more closely related to it than it is to plants
m2 is a waste of ammo.
Yahtzee.
"Science progresses via carefully conducted studies and data analysis to either support or disprove a proposed theory"- Science
I think what peaked my attention was 3 years ago when HR made their numbers public the stock popped. Haven't really noticed a trend... so it must have just been that year.  I'm going to try buy a house with my refund this year :) your welcome America
Source: In the spirit of the thread, I made it up and it's almost certainly not true. Sorry.
aw, HEYL NAW!
Karmas a bitch yes?  Hhehehehehehehee
100 years? That's ridiculous!
I thought someone had created a ventrilo server where a bunch of men would gather and talk about not fapping.
I don't even live in the US so I don't know why you are saying "you". Mexico's forces could enter the country but would be stopped easily. Canada would get a bit farther than Mexico but they are so close that the attacks are limited.
From your smiley face I'm going to assume this is joke and that you don't have a shred of belief in what you said.
I've been thinking of making a poster of the last phrase of his quote, here is my mock-up.  Please help me pick a better font than Times italicized: http://i.imgur.com/RImLe.jpg 
The worst part of that picture is now I'm not only afraid of the dark, but OF THE FUCKING LIGHT
Yes, next.
You were raised in a cult.  We still have lots of room for improvement here on the west coast.
Kicking babies doesnt seem so bad.
Makes sense that it would be easier to learn Spanish when you're dependent on using it in a Spanish environment than a class where you learn a couple hours at a time.
Soon to be ex-sister???? How can you have an ex-sister???
Unless the mods have changed it, this and other related subreddits / links will be listed in the /r/trees sidebar ---------------------------------&gt;
It's not. Need extra money? Sign up as a human test subject.
GUYS SPY IS ME.  WHO AM I?  THE SPY RUNNING AROUND!  I JUST TOLD YOU!
I thought this was going to be funny until the cat starting hitting the cymbal when it should have been hitting a snare and then I just got pissed and turned it off.
Please add five sample questions.
That's somewhat unlikely to kill you.
I'm not going to get into personal details, but I work in computer security. I, and many of my friends are in limbo between private and public sector positions. I just had a friend who quit his federal government job to work for a contractor. He was making $60k and now makes $115k. Now, what do you think is more likely? A private company overpaying him or the government underpaying him?  It's simple economics - supply and demand - the more specialized you are, the MORE in demand you are. Why do surgeons and engineers make so much money? 
I was wondering how that model holds up her giant fucking melon head. Seriously, that's huge. Like, watermelon huge.
there is shitty stuff for every generation, and every generation grows up and looks at kids and goes "ugh the world is going to hell". someone's great grandpa getting pissed about elvis is a lot like you getting pissed about bieber
Torsky is doing something strange when I try to sign up. Seems there is a special secret sign up password.
Just remember, what you put out there you can't take back.  If you have a reputation that could get ruined by this, avoid it.
What exactly constitutes "meaningful commentary" on this subreddit? I personally come here to casually enjoy pony related content and humor, but overall I have very little to say that is actually serious or meaningful (exclude this thread).
I hate when you can't tell if you have cramps or if you need to poop. This happens to me way too much.
Upvote for Doors shirt!
i though his character name was cooler then the hordes of cash he got
Aw that sucks midterms and exams. Thank god for Canadian education system 
There was another (full passenger) plane taxiing ahead and I think the story was that he was attempting to control the plane until the last second.  Why he didn't eject after losing his gear and all real control I don't know.
I'm saying that Russians/Ukranians have always had better level teams than everyone else, except for the Chinese and select SEA teams. And if you're playing at a decent level and run into someone who's Russian, odds are he's really, really good. All the Russians I've hit on ladder are dirty good - same with most of the Chinese players. It's because, frankly, it's likely they've just played a lot more dota than a random NA player.  It's also easy to hate Russian players becuase of cognitive bias, and they stand out more than NA players. 
You know what that's worth?  In theory, it's priceless.  In reality, it's worthless.
Can I get a electrizier? I should be able to trade now if you want
maybe in the context of fires but beyond that I will take forest everytime. Turf is weird. Trees are beautiful and I likes me some clean fresh forest air. 
Would it not be cheaper to purchase old farm equipment?
Why do I feel so good for laughing at Novell Web Access?
Does the gentleman *truly* wish for me to take the requisite steps in fulfilling this request, or might he take the example of my *six* children as proof enough?
Very funny and effective poster, but 85% is significantly higher than any number I can find (30-40%)
oh well...i was bored XD
http://www.reddit.com/r/rangers/comments/p5aq5/game_thread_rangers_devils_7_pm_est_131/
search spotify for any of the artists listed below. browse related artists. repeat indefinitely.
Thank you.
I just want to cover you in downvotes. No homo.  edit: haha holy shit I meant upvotes. That is too funny to fix.
West Toll Cross
I read the whole of that Baby X story, waiting for the most inevitable thing to happen, and it never did ... first day at school, the other kids would have solved the curiosity with one quick look in the underpants ... X would have been just as curious to know what sex he was
Would you like to not fuck me?
I'm still looking for the arrow. Maybe it doesn't appear in Chrome?
[relevant](http://www.quickmeme.com/meme/35sat5/)
His tone was as if she committed a deliberate injustice by not mentioning him, to me it seemed rather uncalled for.
Ok, this is my first post here. I don't really know what I'm doing...  I am a martial artist (aikido) and have always been taught under the following mantra:  If you ever have to use it, you have already lost.  The real skill is in conducting yourself in a way in which you never end up in a fight. I understand this is a skill that we develop as we mature, and part of that journey is in dealing with idiots like this bully.  If your son gets into a fight or rises to the bait this lad is laying, the way it seems to me is that when we match energy levels and attitude with people like this, we are in just as much rapport (strange as it may sound) as if we were friends laughing at the same joke. By entering into rapport with this person, your son is being like him.  In terms of giving advice, I don't know if it is my place! I was bullied mercilessly during my school years until I learned just to say 'that's right' and walk away.
Rick Perry's
I'm asking for other sources too. Perhaps a gaming related tracker might have an own chess category. 
So what you're saying is...the Rogers centre could potentially become the first stadium to grow [/r/trees](/r/trees) ? :O
ghostbusters for DD
On average, house prices double every 10 years (that's the same as increasing by 7% a year).  So if you're nearly 30 then the prices should be about 8 times higher.
I plan on coming by.  My laptop barely functions with power, let alone without, so I won't have my own computer.  But I can always criticize other people's work or something...
Sweet dude. 
I don't believe anything in the bible, I occasionally flirt with the idea of a higher power, and I don't think the big bang theory is a complete model (albeit the best explanation we have). So what does that make me? 
The best substitute for sugar I've found is a combination of Erythritol and Stevia such as used in [this recipe](http://www.healthyindulgences.net/2009/05/healthy-chocolate-cake-with-secret.html) .  I played around with both of them alone first, making sugar water and comparing to each of them. Stevia has a kind of bitter after taste and erythritol has a cooling effect if you have too much of it. You really notice the difference. But in combination I could not tell the difference at all.  I've made some pretty awesome chocolate milk with it ^_^  Neither seem to have been proven to raise blood pressure (though I couldn't find any studies looking at this specifically in the case of Erythritol).  Finally, both are "natural", for the nutjobs who think that's important =P
Fucking gills! You can't explain that! [FTFY]
High waist jeans and bangs, jesus fuck it looks retarded.
Well played with your words person. 
I am trying to stay around $150 a little over isn't going to kill me but I can't spend $200
How many people were lynched in the good ole days?  And why?
Up!  Vote, that is!  As in I have upvoted you for your kind reply!
Because they have no standards, is what I thought.
Thank you!
why she takes one good well photoshopped imagine and all you virgins can't stop drooling with your hand on your pecker? there are a hundred other celebrities out there with far better looks than her.
If you're man enough to put your dick in a girl, you better be man enough for the potential consequences.
A lot of the time it's done so that the support can carry CV and an escape. It's got a lot to do with matchups as well. For example, if the enemy team has a ton of CC and you're running Vayne, odds are you'll want Cleanse over Heal, and you'll go without CV. 
I would buy the Gerber over the Leatherman solely due to Leatherman being on the supporting side of SOPA.   
Oh wow, that advisor sounds crazy helpful. The resume critique was great, I look forward to returning for interview/job search tips like you did!
layin' pipe
Something very similar to this exists in Ohio.
that is just wow!! O_O
I've heard good things about that place too. It's a dive, but that's my kind of place anyway.  We could go Saturday night. Seems to be the best option for everybody here.
I took a $432 order the other day and got no tip... $5 is something, man.
I'M OLD GREGGGGGG!!
This is the most clever, artistic,﻿ and all around Renaissance-esque song I've ever heard. Well done.
I have you tagged, I won't say for what, but keep up the good work
I know a woman who believes that sugar causes depression. She believes that cutting it out can solve any mental illness.
Every one has an asshole. It's not specific to any sexual orientation.
Those look great!
This is so sad :):)
Happened to me too! :(
Okay, but I still do not see how having a problem with women who falsely accuse people of rape constitutes "women-hating bullshit", and whilst I will grant you that sure, it's most likely a man accused of rape has committed it, I still maintain that it's fucking stupid to treat him differently either way. Innocent until proven guilty.
stoked
This. If she is a close friend, be one and help her. 
My wife and I had our officiant (ordained minister friend of ours) start off with the "wuv, bwings usth togewther" bit from Princess Bride, then toss the book over his back, whip out a Palm Pilot and do the rest from there.  We were married on the grounds of a large software company....  :-)
[Ahem.](http://www.reddit.com/r/christianity)
You guys would make a good team.
I hope so too! This is actually great news if they are pinning his concussion symptoms to this; it suggests that this may not be a neurological issue after all. 
Bejeweled 3 is an awesome game. Many times I found myself going over games I have on my computer, including BF3, MW3, SC2, and found that I don't really want to play any of them, so I open Bejeweled 3 and match some gems.
SOUL 
What motherboard and case do you have?  The answers to most of your questions will depend on the answer to that question.
'Till we meet again..
That terminal velocity in our atmosphere was the exact same for every object regardless of weight or surface area.
One of these teletubbies is going to die of tuberculosis if they keep hanging around Poe. 
This was on the front page today?  Well shit...  Friend sent it to me, sowwy.
Gotta love us :D
I don't believe her goal is to enlighten us. 
(a) [EBM] (NSF) Watchman 304 (with the spaces)  (b) The Vintage Kritzkrieg  (c) I found a garden of ice sculptures made by four C&amp;D/Spy-Cicle spys (two red, two blue). People from both teams began stopping to admire the work. Slow-moving viewers became exhibits. [*True Story*](http://i0.kym-cdn.com/entries/icons/original/000/006/216/7nTnr.png)
If 100% of Vulcans were going gay I'd totally understand what you're saying.  But assuming homosexuality in Vulcans is the same with humans - about 10% - letting gay Vulcans exist as equals with others would be the same as letting Vulcans with any natural quality exist.  IDIC and all that :)
thankyou for the quick reply :D
I live in 'murica and I have a right to make ma password kitty123
What if I were a stapler?  EDIT: Sort of reminded me of the Pinewood Derby episode of South Park.
I must say that I'm expecting protesters' offer to be turned down, then numerous headlines in the Evening Post etc. reporting indignation at how much it cost to fix.  Disclaimer: I am neutral on the protest.
The supreme court was right, its just that they shouldn't have been. That fateful March 4, 1789 changed everything. I wish I could have experienced life under the articles of confederation. 
What's her username?
... wait WHAT!? STOP STALKING ME YOU STALKER
You didn't before I posted that, I can guarantee it. There was 1 upvote, and that was mr44x's. 
+1 to this. I had always been clicking "new save" without thinking, and ended up with about 600 saves.  It took forever to delete them all, but as soon as I did, loading screens are now only displayed for about 10 or 15 seconds instead of a few minutes.  I haven't bothered turning off auto-save.  Unless you manually save methodically, I can see this ending in disaster when you get unexplectedly one-hitted by someone and your last save was half an hour previous.
Yeah I didn't get a prompt to subscribe, just an ad. 
We started in the east.. then we traveled West... then we traveled further West.. so there was West.. and super-West.   Unfortunately, they went with MidWest/West instead of West/SuperWest.
I think he meant I-4.
Screw you man, I'm not your slave!!
I presented my points in a clear and rational manner.  There was no ranting anywhere in what I said. I made claims, supported them, and then connected all those trains of thought.  You're obviously incapable of addressing or refuting anything I've said, congratulations.  Have fun ignoring debate because you can't deal with curse words and use it as an excuse to brush people off.
Congrats on living in Oregon!
Yes, 5 years in April.
His one-hand rocket pass from the top of the key to Boozer right under the basket was fantastic!
I've hated CoD since MW1, so there's that.  Long Live CoD 2!
Y el pedo que muchos se quedaron en esas ideas caducas y rancias de hace 200 años.
I will absolutely concede to this. Cheers.
Thank you sir!
Well, the Liberal Party of BC is actually a coalition between the federal Liberals and Conservatives.  They band together to keep the NDP out.  The Conservative Party of BC isn't affiliated to Harper's party.  They are just gaining some traction among pissed off right-wingers.  They don't have a hope in Hell in winning an election, but they just might let the NDP in!
you sir are awesome!!
Finished the trilogy last week.  Loved it.
no one ever seems to cotton to the fact that a) this subreddit isn't private, and b) it's on any new redditor's front page, by default.  [/r/atheism](/r/atheism) isn't some little speakeasy sequestered in the back of a barbershop, it's a public forum on one of the largest sites on the internet.  it's great that you feel entitled to come here and rant, but please quit pretending that this subreddit is somehow separate from the internet.  what you say here, what you post here, gets indexed by google.  every redditor has seen it at least once.  if it were private, not only would the ability to post be password protected, but the content wouldn't be viewable without a password, either.
I'd take the bubbler on the right.
Have you also checked the Waypoint app? Also I have heard 343 is listening to the forums as much as they can, try making a post about adding more stats.
this http://sf.streetsblog.org/wp-content/uploads/2009/12_03/WALL_E_fat_chair.jpg
*Copy*                   **Paste**
http://www.branzone.com/ $1.24 /slot
I've been with the same woman since we were 15, we're getting married this December.
[*DUDE* **FUCK BLUETEXT**](//#neodestiny)
hmm. interesting. did you add that on your self? any reason for it? you do a lot of one-footers? or just a cooler stomp pad?
No, they can't do none of that, they aren't superheroes you know!
That's a Janet Craig Compacta... 
I guess a more detailed explanation is that banks don't want to deal with the risk of something falling through when it's done on financing. Even if you're pre-approved for financing, your lender might not accept the property in the condition it is.  The deal might fall through and the Bank(Seller) would have wasted months.  Many times, foreclosures are sold as-is. Banks don't even really know what the property looks like, they're just trying to sell it and take it off their books. If you are financing the purchase, sometimes the bank that gave you the loan will have certain requirements on homes you buy.   They basically want to make sure money enters their pockets. They don't want to go through a 60 day process, only to find out that you don't actually have financing because the property doesn't meet certain guidelines and standards. 
That actually looks great and I really like it. I usually make control groups and just look at the number.
"Cuz I aint no Harlem black girl.." - Gwen Stefani 'Hollaback Girl'
You can't. It is likely that it is over. You are the better person. It will suck for awhile but everyone goes through it and you will come out on the other end. You might want to talk to that same counsellor about a note to defer the exams.
Not really. My life plan is quite different. It's probably unlikely, but I would want to get a nice girlfriend, make a game, sell it for millions, get rich, smoke lots of weed, throw fun parties, and not have kids. Maybe marriage, but marriage doesn't quite interest me.
Whatever you do will have some negative impact, even just existing causing habitat loss. Realistic vegans don't think that they are perfect. 
I think that you can make them without violating the NAP.  I have a hard time, however, seeing how they can be used and targeted only at a violator of the NAP.  
Well then what are you waiting for! Go back and take everything! 
They probably just really liked crabs.
This video is completely unwatchable.
He is a scapegoat in the sense that this **terrible punishment** that has been brought down upon him makes it appear as though there exists a shred of justice in the system. Every once in a while the masters will throw one of their own under the bus to keep up appearances. The hilarious thing is that it tends to work quite well. 
This.  Will take a couple of weeks after you've submitted everything for the order(proof of citizenship, proof of firearms related activity, and proof of membership in associated organization;Less' link is probably the cheapest), but it will ship to your door.  They don't have any carbines in right now though :(
To be fair, the atheists here challenge the beliefs of people who are fully able to make up their own mind. As children we were indoctrinated by religion before being able to form our own opinions.
But overall, that person still has to deal with being in Bronze league. They have to deal with loss and an ego in a healthy way.  I agree with your point, though. A game should feel fun and rewarding no matter what your level of play is.
dubstep sucks anyways
I actually tried doing exactly that, and it didn't work at all.
I'm going to answer your original question of what my point is, but not getting troll baited any further.  If you took a pancake recipe, removed the eggs, and didn't substitute something that brought complex proteins, fats, binding power, and leavening power to the party, then I have a hard time believing what you made is a passable pancake. My point is you don't know how to cook, and what you describe as fucking awesome was probably flat, spongy, and terrible.
isn't this just liquibets?
Wow you are stunning. Made both of us smile!
Literally nothing I've said could spoil anything for anyone.  I've written initials, and even if they could be puzzled out easily, no one could guess what the theory was regarding other than the people involved without already having read some other speculation.  It would be no different than saying the 'King Theory' or something else innocuous.
I'm curious, you and blue genes both suggest trying to gain complete control(I've never really felt like I've had control, but I do feel consciously present). How would that benefit me?   I'm more interested in just not having them, not having to remember what happened. I feel like even with a completely lucid dream, the general content would be still be there to bother me when I wake up. I don't see the benefit to having control unless I can completely change the dreams content or simply stop it all together.
Received :D
The Amazing Randi!   http://www.radioclashblog.com/wp-content/uploads/2010/01/6QG8J.jpg http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=M9w7jHYriFo total badass!
I never lied to a GM. I had the item in my inventory prior to it being reimbursed.  This day an age, they have to tools to see if you had something, prior to it being restored. Crazy concept, huh?!
I have a few friends who use Jack3d in the gym, none of them rowing competitively anymore. They certainly seem to be able to train harder than previously, they are more intense to the point at getting a bit too angry.  Haven't looked into it personally, but I'm told that some of the ingrediants may be on the WADA banned list. Not necessarily what they put on the label either. You need to be very aware of what supplements you use. My advice was always to use either products from very well known companies who cant afford the bad PR, or very pure protien powders mixed at home with powdered milk, milo etc.
If bodily fluid is to be exchanged, the solution is a cure or a vaccine for every STI (or even just the most common ones). We're working on it.  The alternative is to prevent fluid from being exchanged. Condoms do this reliably. If you want thinner condoms, we're working on it.  tl;dr: We're working on it.
There are easier ways of expressing that you've got nothing, such as, you know, *not expressing anything at all.*
Picture was posted on a Berkeley journalism blog in 2005...  I imagine westerners (including myself) would be quick misidentify a billboard unless it has a commercial advertisement. You can imagine that billboards are effective venues for political advertisements (and most probably, propaganda).
Wait people still go to Tucker Maxx?
What I thought of when I saw this: http://i44.tinypic.com/qoysxx.gif
Would it help if I pointed out that violent crime, especially rape, SKYROCKETED after the gun ban? All rapes are preventable if women were armed.
I was guessing, actually &gt;_&gt;
That sounds HIGHLY IMPRACTICAL!
Why would the government take down the satellite and make the statement seem credible? It it was just ignored it would be like any other statement about area 51. It just doesn't make sense to me. Also there is some logic problems with some of the people that think its true.  Claims to be area 51 employee- Totally true! Calls back and says it was a prank- The guy is lying!
Yes we can  OH MY GOSH I HATE YOUUUUU DARN YOUUUUUUUUUUU  \*crusades\*
Psych! It was helpful. :)
Yes, heaven forbid they have an easy game that appeals to gamers and non gamers. Great game? No, not really. Gateway game? You betcha.
I wonder about that sometimes. People say that the Doom killed all the dragons, but dragons are hatched in volcanoes. They are made of fire. I know the Doom was crazy intense volcanic activity, but would it really kill creatures *made* of fire?  It would be funny if you're right and the 'curse' around Valyria is actually dragons that have gone feral.
... an epic tragedy in 3 lines.
Cup of tea.
I'm totally over this.  \*sighs\* You didn't do what I asked with my first question.  Here's what he *said* when he worked on the Sabbath. Matthew 12:11-12  &gt;He said to them, “If any of you has a sheep and it falls into a pit on the Sabbath, will you not take hold of it and lift it out? How much more valuable is a person than a sheep! Therefore it is lawful to do good on the Sabbath.”  He justified it.  As for the fig tree?  It's never said that it *belonged* to someone. Fig trees (in fact, all kinds of trees) just grow in the world, you know. As for the donkey? Well, he didn't steal it, did he. His disciples did (yes, I'm being legalistic). Also, the owners just were like "Dude, whatcha doin'?" and the disciples said, "The Lord needs it," and the owners didn't say anything back. So it wasn't some furtive "steal it in the night so no one sees you" kind of thing (this part is mentioned in Luke, but not Matthew. Also keep in mind that they're telling the same exact story there, it's not two separate instances).  Jesus justifies "working" on the Sabbath as I already showed.  Yannow, a much better argument for you would be to talk about the blatent destruction of property Jesus did in the temple, later in Matthew 21, for instance. Learn your Bible, you can beat people with it when you know it better than them.
Fucking THIS. Fuck tanning. Its so stupid. bunch of oompa loompas. Orange skin with the lipstick that is one shade from their tan + duck face = IM CLOSING MY FACEBOOK NOW
Gosh sorry Skrillex, my bad. Was just trying to help, my bad for not being a certified professional. 
It still stink...
&gt; I must have mistyped. Any theological conclusion concerning the nature  &gt; of God is necessarily special pleading.  You're mistaken, there's no special pleading involved in the cosmological argument, which is the argument that pertains to this issue.  &gt; Aristotle thought he could resolve infinite regress by thinking in terms  &gt; of circles which have no endpoints.   No he didn't.  He solves the problem of infinite regress with the first and unmoved mover.  &gt; Still has a cause.  This doesn't make any sense.  &gt; That would have had to begin with Aristotle figuring out what he was  &gt; saying.   No, it's not hard.  One begins by reading Aristotle and accurately discussing what it is he says.  You don't do this.  So, not knowing what Aristotle says, you have no basis to make meaningful judgments about what he says.
*The Social Construction of Reality* by Peter Berger and Thomas Luckmann. As a Sociology grad student, this is one of those books that really blew my mind. It gets pretty esoteric at times, but it's a good introduction to a lot of contemporary social theory.
Have you noticed they're never in the same place at the same time?! 
Just make sure your son knows that there is a difference between kicking somebody's ass or standing up for himself and going too far and causing serious damage to somebody.  What my dad told me when I was dealing with this sort of thing was, "You can win a fight and make your point without destroying a person.  Kick his ass, don't kill him."  If it's a simple fight at school brought on by bullying, your son wont face charges.  He might get suspended from school for a few days but that should be it.
I don't know why that made me think I was at a Renascence festival...  If you're asking when I put up a new one, it is usually mid month.  I think I did this one around a week ago, maybe two.
Long legs! So sexy! :D  How tall are you, by chance?
Make sure your Ph is consistent, be sure both watering and feeding are nearly the same. I had the same issues until I tightened up my Ph via a pen tester.
Agreed, more input on what the OP is planning and maybe we can come up with something.  Single cell sequencing (and isolation) doesn't seem likely.
If you think C+C Music Factory is Techno, you have a lot to learn about electronic music.
That would certainly save us time on event days, and would help differentiate from the nightly ArmA meetups. Would you think some sort of rotation/sign-up for planning/leading events would be a good idea? 
no way the living tombstone made this
Women wearing Uggs outside.
Glyphosate makes me happy.
This is an old comment but I think I have some insight.  Recently my father printed out an article he linked to from The Blaze.  It was an op-ed article by Allen West in which he was telling Pelosi and other liberals to get the hell out of America.  I glanced at the byline, said the word warmonger, and put it down.  He looked at me with a shocked expression on his face and asked if I called West a whoremonger?  I said no.  He is a warmonger, a man who loves war.  The conversation stopped there.  He did not press it and neither did I.  My insight is this.  He rightly believes that the leftist are out to destroy the America he has always known.  He believes those same liberals are against America going to war against her enemies because they hate America.  He completes the fallacy by believing that people who want America to go to war against its enemies are patriotic, conservative Americans.  Being in favor of war is not about the war in and of itself.  It is about being part of the group that is trying to save America.  It is about group identification.
you are adorable &lt;3 I'd say longer hair but that's about it!
That was THE reason I originally made an account. A friend told me that if you made an account, you could change what went on your frontpage. I had just been visiting each subreddit individually partially because I hated the stuff from those two subreddits. I just cannot stand either of them (and I'm liberal/atheist, it's not that I completely disagree with their beliefs, just the way they talk about them). I am sure for some people they are great, but I think for most having those subreddits unsubscribed makes your reddit surfing experience a lot more pleasant.
Of course! I'm a blogger too, and I work to help build a [website/tools for bloggers](http://www.skinnyscoop.com)...so I love reading other blogs and sharing what I find :)
Upvotes for the plug. Do I pay for click or unique impression?
Interesting. I've had the hardcore negative emotions you talked about in one post before--- from a hell ton of shrooms it felt like I was in hell/a dream--- and then there was this weird blip and it felt like a huge joke had been played on me. Didn't seem like a permanent thing though--- I've had these terrifying existential panic attacks at times since then--- it feels like my mind is falling apart and then things will stabilize a bit after a while--- now I'm just wondering where all this is going to go. so yea, lol
I was called arrogant by one bitch in high school.  But I thought she was a scumbag and honestly didn't value her opinion on anything (including her opinion of me).  Other than that, I really don't come off as arrogant.
Thanks for that link!
I think they are the same.  The magic sauce.  I see on fat secret that they have it at 60 calories/0 carbs but I find that hard to believe.  
Finding a good Olympic coach in person. If you want to be an advanced/competitive Olympic lifter, you need a qualified coach. The lifts are far too technical to really teach via 5 minute videos. Rippetoe's cuing for the power clean is okay for beginners, but as the guy above you said, that advice won't get you past an intermediate level. He shouldn't be downvoted though, he said nothing wrong.
Just stop.
Your so called strategy for obtaining  potent opiates in a large amount is otherwise known as drug seeking.  Any half aware Dr. will home in on this.  Expect anything from naproxen 500 MG one every 12 hours to Mobic as directed.  Opiates aren't usually indicated for vascstomies, though perhaps you might get a script for 15 tabs of 1/4 grain codeine.  Prolonged post op pain may be treated short term with hydrocodone before you're given a nerve block.  I sincerely doubt you'll get any dilaudid. Though you never know.
keep him in the basement and feed him baby ruth bars and eventually he will find a pirate treasure with some neighborhood kids and you will be rich!
But you have sex with your mom, your kids will have two heads.
Music. It's all good high.
Awesome! I'm a cosplayer, and cosplay every year. If you're looking to meet people, attending photoshoot gatherings is always good. However be warned that some fandoms have more er enthusiastic fans than others. 
[BannedINDC](http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=tAJYARIngtg) wooooo
I get .75 on Verizon.  It sucks.  I'd drop data all together if Verizon offered the option.  
100 cards to start. EDH is an entirely different format. It uses exactly 99 cards and a commander. Every non-basic land must be distinct. So start by filling the 100 card quota.
Phew.  :)
Yeah I though the clip was unfamiliar. The one I'm thinking of was of a white SG previously owned by Mary Ford, Les Paul's wife. I don't if that guy was actually who he claimed to be, but what scumbag sells his "priceless" (great?)aunts guitar.
Check out the subreddit: [/r/illusionporn](http://www.reddit.com/r/illusionporn)
Reddit. Das Grotto.
Haha ok well what would be a normal foot jam 
lol.  It's kinda' true.  Upvote.
Just pay the hospital $1/month  problem = solved
That would actually be a 100% markup (selling for cost + a profit equal to cost), or a 50% gross margin, or selling for 2x cost.  Gets confusing and messy.
I have about 30 mats. Tell me what you like and you can have one.
A creation story is just that, a story. it originated as a why to say God created everything, it was never supposed to be empirical truth. You can believe God created everything thru the natural process of evolution (not intelligent design nonsense)  And I just pointed out that the two largest groups of theists do believe in evolution. together they account for over 2 billion people possibly 3 billion. And the Catholic Church is by no means the only evolution believing church Its just the one I can say with authority supports evolution, I am pretty sure most Lutheran denominations accept evolution too.
I like planks and hanging leg raises. I eventually want to use planks to progress to ab wheel rollouts and then to dragon flags.
I just recognized that I had seen all of them live, talked with one of them and with another one a workshop (guess?). And then I forget them :(
&gt;Christianity is [a unifying belief structure].  You'd think so,  except,  this isn't the case. Being a catholic in a non-catholic but heavily Christian community can get pretty annoying.   
"Good morning Mr. Presid**ENT**"
Bad parents for caring about their childs future? Sure its not the best way to show support or guidance, but I can definitely say its not the worst.
I've always enjoyed billboards. You can still find old ones that set back and have been forgotten. They are a great find. I have a friend that lost weight searching billboards due to walking and calculating how many calories she would eat per day. BTW, There actually is available an online calculator that will tell you how many calories your body is burning and how many calories you should eat per day to gain or lose weight. For anyone interested the &lt;a href="http://howtogainweight123.com/calculators/lose-weight-calculator"&gt;weight loss calculator&lt;/a&gt; is located at http://howtogainweight123.com . This could help you to know how to adjust your diet to either gain weight or lose weight.
I will try this out when I get home later today. Thanks for the advice.
Right. I forgot they removed winged couriers and rev wards. 
that trough looks oddly familiar
You should feel that way!
&gt; We really need to get something of the scale of 2002-03, preferably even larger, with the staying power of the Occupy movement.  How about forming a party and voting it into power, if you really do have the support of a significant part of the population? I mean, if you're just a loudmouth making a lot of noise but with no real ideas or support, that won't work, but if you have a real plan that could work, and if you represent the needs of a majority of the public, well, you could really make it!
Yes. This is [The Mark of Cain](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/The_Mark_of_Cain_\(2000_film\)) excellent film.
Same here. The employees at my Gamestop more or less know me (I live in a small town). They're pretty chill, I've never gotten stereotyped there.
I'd pay him alright, I'd pay him to go away, lol.
&lt;3 Barbershop, and this tag is awesome.
Personally I love to talk shit online. Makes playing games a lot more fun.
Thats great! Now please edit your vote to change to [](/no)
Thank you. :)
[](/soawesome) you're a silly pony!
but I could have gotten it for $10 if I had 50% Valve and someone else asked for it for BOI which is $4.99
There is a special place in hell for people that don't know how to use all of the lanes to merge
It's your fault. You did something to push her away. Now take that life lesson, and use it in your next relationship. You will find someone new. 
I drove a 2012 Charger, 2 actually, and the Challenger in both auto and stick. And yes it was pretty much the stick that decided it for me. The charger does have the new 8 inch lcd which integrates all performance data and monitoring, mine is still on the 4 inch display behind the steering column. The new charger is also just insanely badass looking. But I drive the car every day, and I use it as a mood improver. The stick was just more fun for me.   The automatic guys are running faster quarter mile times, 12.2 seems to be the high average, because it has launch control and is just so consistent. But the six speed tranny is a revelation, I had to have it.
&gt;C'est ce qu'elle a dit.
Don't forget about yesterday.
no no usb 3.0.  However I actually managed to get one keyboard to work. and the mouse now works but its sticking every few seconds.  the keyboard is actually now not working again.  but when it was it was really delayed and it was freaking out.  i dont know.
...or if you're a legitimate president.
Boot
Well, you say it's bullshit, but the poor chicken you're tormenting probably thinks otherwise. Take that on any level you wish. Especially an agricultural one.
I rented it from blockbuster today (gamepass. blockbuster, yea weird i know) and so far its real good. If you liked XIII you'll surely like this one as well. To be fair, I'm only 2.5 hours into the game but already I can tell there is more "openess" to it rather than XIII's linear style. The combat system is basically the same but with a few new tweaks. The level up system (crystallium or whatever its called) isn't as spread out as XIII's was. It's no longer seperated by paradigm class and takes place on one giant crystal grid. It's hard to explain but I like it as opposed to the previous style.   If renting is not an option, then I would say buy it if you are a hardcore FF fan. The only reason I rented this one instead of buying it is because the last direct sequel made (FF X-2) instantly made me regret buying it.
More like the only thing we have to fear is whether or not Time magazine will get it right this time. I though everyone knew by now that the whole Ice Age thing from the 1970s was mostly a media construct without that much scientific consensus, based on the limited data set from over 30 years ago, and confounded by the extensive sulphate aerosols which were the result of increased burning of high sulfur coal, which was mostly eliminated by international treaty. Please try to keep up!
With a certain algorithmic design, it's not possible to run a program in any reasonable amount of time at all. Maybe this doesn't bother you if you postulate an infinitely-powerful computer, but then you're not really talking about simulationism, but rather the notion that we're all dreams in the mind of God... whatever that theory is called.  In other words, if simulationists can look at certain artifacts in the world and see them as evidence of simulation, I can look at certain ways physics is designed and see them as evidence that it is very unlikely we're in a simulation. There's very simple changes to physics that would make the thing run X times faster, for an unspeakably, unimaginably large value for X.
At the moment, as it seems to fluctuate slightly, I'm planning on making:  * Sylvari Thief * Asuran Guardian * Asura/Charr Engineer * Norn Ranger * Human Mesmer/Necromancer  I just love the Sylvari and Asura design, stealthy tree-man and a tiny Heavy-hitter, what more can you ask for? I'm torn between Charr and Asura for my engineer, but siding with Charr at the moment as I'm already planning an Asuran character.
Umm that's not a filter on the music... that's the music itself..
It's a classic crossover. [This page](http://www.facebook.com/MareWithAMouth) has been up since May I think.
Sedan=saloon   Estate=station wagon
That is what's known as a bud sport. http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Sport_%28botany%29
Deman still consistently cuts people off mid-sentence though, even after asking them to speak, which when it comes to discussions about builds and items he's fairly clueless at in comparison. He also needs to learn not to make snide retarded comments at people in chat/forums that he doesn't like. That's really unbecoming of any caster of any game, and ridiculously unprofessional.
Sounds perfectly reasonable to me
My little bike's in the shop. Busted and bent forks with the seals being totally fucked. Yamaha RX-50  I am turning it into a cafe racer, though. Lots of new stuff on it. Hopefully it'll pay off when I sell it down the road. Love it, but realize owning two (especially since the little one is so expensive!) is just too much.  [The other is a 454, which I just got back from the same shop.](http://i.imgur.com/8dsakh.jpg)  1980s Vulcan 750, but smaller and more efficient.
Well come over and show me what a good one is like.
Looking for a new job this year? Finding it tough? Don't despair, get inspired and read on...
&gt;should never do anything to raise "concern or suspicion in any way".  of course they would never actually state what any of that stuff is, we need a big list of words that should never be used in the same sentence as "United states" i,ll start :   Freedom
[This](http://www.reddit.com/r/conspiracy/comments/ot77b/what_do_you_guys_think_about_morgellons_disease/) was what I was talking about.
oh wow! lots of schtuffs!!! thanks! =D
lols u are sososos retarded nice chromosemes did ur mom forget to give u the reading comprehension gene or did u lose it when u were jacking off to  straw wars furry porn??  /told
&gt;Continued infractions SHOULD lead to a ban because they are unproductive, and in the end, hate speech, to justify marginalization of men's issues, and the demonization of men.  I agree but ignatiusloyola has refused to do so: http://www.reddit.com/r/MensRights/comments/p3evt/just_to_reiterate_please_do_not_post_links_to_srs/c3maufm
That's still not the target audience for the show. The target audience is young girls (and possibly their parents by necessary extension, since parents have the money to buy the toys and stuff).
After I was accepted and spoke with the director of the program, he told me how impressed he was with my statement and actually remembered it offhand.  Not to brag, but just to show that being personal in education is a good thing. Remember who your audience will eventually be-- people who don't want a robot, but someone that is friendly and warm.
also UFC, big soccer games?"
Mama...  Just killed a man.  Put a gun against his head.
Isn't there some conspiracy theory that says the Rothschilds control everything, and they're some weird alien-lizard-human-Jew hybrid clan?
No winter?:O Dude it's -20 degrees celcius here.  I'm cold, so cold... 
Actually, I just made an account after lurking on here for awhile since I finally had something to ask about.
aha none of them just yet, in a year maybe. I'm hoping for the Neville Longbottom effect alongside some gym work. 
No.
So why was the OP searching for this question?
 Not necessarily for opinion, but for lack of explanation/feedback?
I had a really shitty day today.  Blacked out and had a seizure. 
I believe the reasoning behind this difference between favorites in foreign vs korea is the society where in korea, its more socially accepted and the huge population therefore you have a higher density of gamers in korea. With so many good players in korea, SC fans have no choice but to prefer the players with results. Notice how we call NA, EU, CN, SEA the foreign scene versus korea when in fact SC2 is an american game lol. Ever since I started mainly following the GSL over the foreign scene, my mentality has changed, how I view the game, how I play it and how I pick my favorites. I tend to like players with consistent results, i dont care much about popularity. I have much respect for whitera, sheth, sjow etc... But I dont prefer them. I favor skill. Depends what you watch really.
Carny? Carnie?
That's the first thing that I thought of, a rack and panniers would be much lighter, plus potentially carry more. It would also be hard to efficiently use the space inside that bike.
I don't get it...
i buy my fruit by the foot too
Whoopie, I hate that word. 
I've done it, it was just six years ago. I know the generalities of how to figure it out, but I don't have any specifics memorized. Also, do you know what the cylinder method is?
Some context would be nice
&gt; E.T. (Katy Perry cover)  Can someone in this thread please explain to me why *anyone* would cover Katy Perry? 
It's Everton. I flew 16,000km to watch City lose to Everton at home. It's like a stigma: oh, Everton? Let's concede the game. Every season. I thought we broke the curse for good earlier this season.
I have basically no reaction at all: dessert buffet at my mom's for Christmas, twelve beers at a tailgate, whatever.  All it seems to do is make me fat and slow.
haha!  me gusta.
I'm glad you finally found it. Took me a while too.
I am a man who always wears a big army coat to hold all the things I bring with me. My Coat is my man purse.
It's tough that there are so many people out there hungry. Many are people who are newly poor and at a loss of how to survive. So many are struggling with a loss in wages, or benefits or who have gotten into mortgage debacle situations and are losing their homes. The fact that she was willing to ask at least kept her fed for another day. It's sweet that you were willing to help. Thank you for that. 
Yeah, I'm always middle-clicking links.  Combine that with Ctrl-W (if you have both hands to work with) and you can look and "go back" quickly.
Thanks! :)
Really?  Do you think the whole city is like that?  Obviously it doesn't compare to actually being there, but a google search shows images like [this](http://blog.travelpod.com/travel-photo/jewels320/1/1297703560/1_quito-streets.jpg/tpod.html) and [this](http://www.google.com/imgres?hl=en&amp;gbv=2&amp;biw=1280&amp;bih=699&amp;tbm=isch&amp;tbnid=dsatbHqi8ctRwM:&amp;imgrefurl=http://www.advrider.com/forums/showthread.php%3Ft%3D480532%26page%3D11&amp;docid=w-S9fwn2fhcIeM&amp;imgurl=http://yhelteljel.ee/wp-content/gallery/louna-ameerika/2009_06_09_I_010_2.jpg&amp;w=900&amp;h=718&amp;ei=038oT-GyCILo2gW2uY2_Ag&amp;zoom=1&amp;iact=rc&amp;dur=479&amp;sig=116476777543535016896&amp;page=1&amp;tbnh=156&amp;tbnw=195&amp;start=0&amp;ndsp=18&amp;ved=1t:429,r:11,s:0&amp;tx=123&amp;ty=59) and [this](http://www.google.com/imgres?hl=en&amp;gbv=2&amp;biw=1280&amp;bih=699&amp;tbm=isch&amp;tbnid=J0HJz0YX0_x6ZM:&amp;imgrefurl=http://www.southamerica.cl/Ecuador/Quito.htm&amp;docid=koX3nAM9n574uM&amp;imgurl=http://www.southamerica.cl/Ecuador/Photos/Quito/Street.jpg&amp;w=270&amp;h=250&amp;ei=038oT-GyCILo2gW2uY2_Ag&amp;zoom=1&amp;iact=hc&amp;vpx=575&amp;vpy=98&amp;dur=967&amp;hovh=200&amp;hovw=216&amp;tx=142&amp;ty=127&amp;sig=116476777543535016896&amp;page=3&amp;tbnh=153&amp;tbnw=177&amp;start=42&amp;ndsp=21&amp;ved=1t:429,r:8,s:42) and [this](http://www.google.com/imgres?hl=en&amp;gbv=2&amp;biw=1280&amp;bih=699&amp;tbm=isch&amp;tbnid=7pfmyoNqdP7-yM:&amp;imgrefurl=http://www.world-traveler.eu/travels-south-america-ecuador.htm&amp;docid=6YDjeK3x5AtCAM&amp;imgurl=http://www.world-traveler.eu/travels-south-america-ecuador-Dateien/ecuador-quito-street-photo.jpg&amp;w=300&amp;h=437&amp;ei=038oT-GyCILo2gW2uY2_Ag&amp;zoom=1&amp;iact=hc&amp;vpx=197&amp;vpy=141&amp;dur=262&amp;hovh=168&amp;hovw=123&amp;tx=131&amp;ty=112&amp;sig=116476777543535016896&amp;page=4&amp;tbnh=168&amp;tbnw=123&amp;start=63&amp;ndsp=21&amp;ved=1t:429,r:10,s:63) and [this](http://www.google.com/imgres?hl=en&amp;gbv=2&amp;biw=1280&amp;bih=699&amp;tbm=isch&amp;tbnid=he1exhDeNX3_iM:&amp;imgrefurl=http://www.usatoday.com/travel/destinations/2008-09-16-quito-old-town_N.htm&amp;docid=HRsrGBwWWuJx9M&amp;imgurl=http://i.usatoday.net/travel/_photos/2008/09/16/quito-topper.jpg&amp;w=472&amp;h=252&amp;ei=aYAoT6LMNYqq2gXo5PW8Ag&amp;zoom=1&amp;iact=rc&amp;dur=547&amp;sig=116476777543535016896&amp;page=2&amp;tbnh=105&amp;tbnw=196&amp;start=17&amp;ndsp=21&amp;ved=1t:429,r:1,s:17&amp;tx=100&amp;ty=57).
It's an EU only Civic Hatchback. So you won't find a lot of articles in the U.S. about it. 
Awesome
calm down, I don't want no trabo
I'm 12 years old and what is this?
Honestly, _most_ languages and platforms [have broken Unicode support](http://stackoverflow.com/questions/1416215/which-programming-languages-were-designed-with-unicode-support-from-the-beginnin).
50? Not 50? Gear? Expertise? Stims, Adrenals, Red buff? Your post has no info at all.
I came here trying to find the legitimate atheists that have come to terms with their views so that i could perhaps shed some light on my own views and beliefs.
How do you know when it's too dry? Too wet? Not enough etc.
I don't want to minimize the serious nature of this issue, but...conceived 3 weeks ago?  "Accuracy of Home Pregnancy Tests at 3 Weeks Pregnant  At 3 weeks pregnant, it's probably too early for you to take at a home pregnancy test. A majority of home pregnancy tests on the market claim that they're over 99 percent accurate, and some claim that they're accurate as early as the first day of your missed period (which will be next week, at 4 weeks pregnant).   Don't be misled by false advertising. Home pregnancy tests work by measuring the level of human chorionic gonadotropin (hCG) in your urine. This pregnancy hormone is produced from cells that come from your placenta. hCG enters your blood stream after the fertilized egg implants in your uterus. As your pregnancy week by week continues, the amount of hCG in your blood stream increases.   At 3 weeks pregnant, you may not have high enough levels of hCG for a home pregnancy test. It's probably best to wait one or two weeks after your missed period before taking a home pregnancy test. You might get false relief, when you are indeed pregnant. Sometimes, you'll get false hope, in the event that you experience a very early miscarriage."  -  http://www.pregnancy-weekbyweek.com/pregnancy-week-3.htm  You two may need to wait another (really long) week or two, then go to Planned Parenthood or another doctor to get a trustworthy test done by a professional to be sure. Good luck. Use condoms.
Wow that's pretty amazing!
Yes, that's what I mean. We don't have that much religious people, but the ones we do have aren't crazy religious either, so it's almost like they're atheists too...  Ninja-Edit: And the reason as to why they're not fundamentalists is because they're socially awkward and don't want to offend anyone.
Fair enough.  Then I would get whatever you like.  Navy pinstripes are always good, as is charcoal or charcoal pin.  If you want something a little different a mid-gray with a blue pin is real sharp.
And now they cameras/scanners to do this automatically for all the cars around them.
[](/c24) Every picture was amazing!
It is a shame that this is all it amounts too, but still an excellent commercial
I'm aware that novels are not cannon.  That said, in the SCE series, one of the officers, I believe the alien linguistics specialist, is in a long term, really-really-long-distance relationship with another man. They make so *little* of it that, even in the story that directly discusses their correspondence I had to go back to check names and pronouns to be sure that I was reading about a gay couple as opposed to a "normal" couple.   By that point in the future, "normal" has moved on a bit, and the writer emphasized it by not emphasizing it, if that makes any sense. It apparently required less comment than a chain-of-command relationship.
It did indeed. No one stole your camera while you had your back turned.
I think they actually could keep all those guys. According to [these](http://nhlnumbers.com/teams/PIT?year=2012) numbers it looks like they would be ok if they traded away one of their higher paid defensemen (Martin/Michalek). They probably have the deepest defensive  corps in the league, especially if you count prospects, so I think they would be comfortable with doing that. they will also habe to let go of a couple smaller contracts, but I think they can do it. Neal would be the only guy of those four who would get a considerable amount more anyway.
So was the print huge, or do you have amazing vision, or was your face awkwardly close to the guy's ass?
Brampton is basically Toronto 
Noted.
For one thing, at least Sandman doesn't waste too much time on Christian mythology. The more you know about Christianity and Judaism, the less you will accept sloppy adaptations of those ideas. I have a hard time enjoying almost anything based on that stuff, but it's even worse when they show no real knowledge of religion or mythology.
Yeah, just saw it! Thanks!
Hehe the thumbnail just gives me a good chuckle. "How does porn get on my computer?!!" 
I'm no more put off by him being a Mormon than I am by any other politician who subscribes to comparable religious ideals.
[](/a22) [My bad!](http://i.imgur.com/epehM.jpg)
I'm just going to say, the encyclicals can be a bit heavy at times.  If you're looking for something easier to read, but still with a solid theological underpinning, I'd **highly recommend** the [Theology of the Body Explained](http://www.ascensionpress.com/shop/Scripts/prodView.asp?idproduct=200).
Bowties are cool.
The New England Silly Nannies  See, I can come up with names too
Just use z33k/playhem/etc.  Relying on blizzard is a lot like relying on the government. You'd rather have separate organizations taking care of that.
Yes similar, this word is use in religious way tho
Thanks! 
Living in Colorado, I second this.   As you get more comfortable, you can use throttle control and the friction zone of your clutch to hold your bike in place without using the brake. However, if i'm on a really steep hill, I will use the rear brake instead.
I support it because I sign on every month and if I have to stand in line behind a sweaty junkie one more time I'm going to smack a bitch, It's not that I think everyone has done wrong but imagine the money the government could save disallowing people who just spend there welfare on drugs.
How about just "Reddit!"
Thanks for the helpful link and comment,  but WOW that's a terribly designed website
This is awesome. These fake injuries have really harmed soccer's image, it's refreshing to see people making light of it.
Yeah, like the Harvard grad is gonna let the guy from Columbia edit the Vietnam War article, come on!
I wish I had better news for you, but the only solutions are to a) gain the weight back or b) get surgery.  There isn't anything you can do with loose skin unfortunately :(
I love how everyone here says "boy im sure glad I started on a 50cc because wow I sure couldn't trust myself with the unbridled power of a ninja 250".  Is everyone here this careful, reserved, and cautious people that you comment like?  Or are you just talking that way thinking you are going to save someones life?  I know for a fact had I started on a 250 I would, in retrospect, have sold it and upgraded to a 600 or larger within 6 months.  Start realistic, put in some time on the bike, and you will gain experience.  Only one way to do it and thats to just ride ride ride ride ride ride!
100 Points to you, you win.  Thanks for playing.
and Pienaar is loaned back to Everton, in arguably the most confusing transfer move of the off season.  That being said in 'Arry and Levy I trust. A lot of people were confused/disappointed with the last window but it seems to have worked pretty well for us. 
&gt;  E'Dena isn't actually his blood relative  This is anti-news at its finest.
Oh, in that case you actually sound like you've got too much on your plate as it is.
As hamlet stated, Global warming refers to an increase by a few degrees of the entire earth's mean atmospheric temperature. Climate change refers to the way this (and other effects such as deforestation, urbanization, etc.) are changing climates of particular regions on earth in more extreme ways. For instance, Global Warming is projected to make some parts of the earth warmer and other parts colder, both would be considered climate change.
You're right, I should have read a little closer.  &gt;Latin American reactions in the 1820s The reaction in Latin America to the Monroe Doctrine was undeniably upbeat. John Crow, author of The Epic of Latin America, states, “[Simón] Bolívar himself, still in the midst of his last campaign against the Spaniards, Santander in Colombia, Rivadavia in Argentina, Victoria in Mexico—leaders of the emancipation movement everywhere— received Monroe's words with sincerest gratitude”.[11] Crow argues that the leaders of Latin America were realists. They knew that the President of the United States wielded very little power at the time, particularly without the backing of the British forces. Furthermore, they figured that the Monroe Doctrine was powerless if it stood alone against the Holy Alliance.[11] While they appreciated and praised their support in the north they knew that their future of independence was in the hands of the British and their powerful navy. In 1826, Bolivar called upon his Congress of Panama to host the first “Pan-American” meeting. In the eyes of Bolivar and his men, the Monroe Doctrine was to become nothing more than a tool of national policy. According to Crow, “It was not meant to be, and was never intended to be a charter for concerted hemispheric action”.
Just in case you didn't feel inadequate as it is.... 0_o
I dunno... Bodacious and Tubular were pretty awesome.
I read your comment in the voice of Gilbert Godfried
[](/zz01)[](/zz00)[](/zz10)[](/zz40)[](/zz30)[](/zz20)
My mother decided to DIY fix the horrible wart on my foot that I'd had for over a year because she was too stingy to buy the convinient treatment, or have the doctor freeze them off. It involved some bootleg chemicals, a razor and my siblings holding me down. Not known for her steady hand she managed to spill acid on the healthy parts of my foot and slice too far with the razor, all whilst I screamed bloody murder. This went on every night for two weeks. Fairplay my wart cleared up and never came back but this is one of the reasons I will be forever thankful for the lovely NHS.  
Ya, but where are they going?
How many games have you participated as a player in? I recall my very first time DM'ing was just terrible. But after having played a number of games with a regular group I'm ready to hop back in the saddle after having watched a few other DM's cope with similar issues.
Those big ass bug eyed sun glasses . . . is their an actual face under there?  As someone a wee bit paranoid they really don't give me a warm fuzzy feeling.
You don't say?
If you want to give him something very difficult to read, "God is not Great".  But if you want to give him something useful to read then "Demon Haunted World".  &gt; He doesn't believe in carbon dating and thinks the Earth is somewhere around 10,000 years old  Please direct him to the [EPICA](http://www.sciencemag.org/content/304/5677/1609) and [Vostok](http://www.ncdc.noaa.gov/paleo/icecore/antarctica/vostok/vostok.html) [Ice cores](http://antarcticsun.usap.gov/science/contenthandler.cfm?id=1491).  They are cores of layered ice drilled from Antarctica that show that there have been 780,000+ seasonal shifts between summer and winter that have deposited roughly equal amounts of precipitation on the Antarctic.  You can literally see each of the 780,000+ years recorded in those Ice cores -- so no tricky formulaic inferences.  You can also point out that there are stars in the sky whose distance can be measured using straight up geometric parallax (just observing their position in the sky 6 months apart which show the maximum deviation and doing a little trigonometry) which reveals that some are 20,000+ light years away.  Then tell him the official definition of a "light year".  Neither of these use carbon dating but easily show that the earth is more than 10,000 years old.
I'm hoping to make it into a 20x30 wall art poster
I love wow. I still play it. I just got the impression that people in SWTOR didn't like it.
have you picked it up before? worth it? Follow up question... how many crap sets are in magic? Like- can you draft with something like this, or will you just end up with entire packs of cards that just can't compete with what is going around?
This. I'm 43, married (no kids - never ever), and just picked stuff back up after about 8 years of playing maybe once every few weeks. Now I'm recording an EP and writing again. I'm doing it just for myself and it is awesome. I'm hoping to perform again soon, as I really loved that. Plus it gets you extra laid, even from your wife.
Good. That way if the CIA kills RP, he is replaced by someone they would like even less.
No, but as someone who studied abroad in India and saw both of those things while there, I liked those options the most.
Clean the battery terminals. Take them off and clean the contact areas between the terminals as well as the posts themselves.
jfchrist. justifying our bloated defense contractors budget again. the usa never fcking learns.
Personally, and I'm only speaking for myself, that's not a bad comparison. Now, I'm not going to deny your experiences. But both Disney and Christianity have a sense of magic to them (you may call it faith), they both try to teach morals to some degree (many of which are completely disgusting and backwards IMO... 1 Timothy 2:12 compared to this ridiculous emphasis on being a princess and how a young lady waits for her man), and both have places where people with similar ideas join together and enjoy those ideas (Church vs Disney Land).   And it's not for no reason; it was posted on /r/atheism. A board for discussing atheism. A non-physical place on the internet where people can talk about their experiences regarding atheism. You have every right to not like it, but I have every right to do the opposite.  I also have every right to insult other' beliefs: I think racial prejudice is fucking disgusting and people who practice it range in degrees of putridness. You're telling me I can't have that view, or are you merely holding religion on a pedestal? 
Cause baby tonight,  DJ's gonna swallow your love again.
Having your income cut from something crazy high you don't deserve to something else smaller, but still crazy high that you don't deserve...  Goodwin's Law.
DONT!, the colour and everything else about it makes it so nice, i would do anythin to lick and fuck that hole xx
You're not serious, are you?
It will Definitely work!!
I would love to be able to grow a mustache like that one day. Cop worthy.
Yeah, small children have no idea what the 90's were like for the fun stuff. If you weren't wearing a denim shirt and rapping to the Chronic right after listening to a grunge song, fuck your idea of the 90's.   You know what the real test is, ask the about MTV. If they name a reality show other than the first couple seasons of the Real World, they don't fucking know.  120 minutes bitches!
It's amazing how their belief is so twisted that they consider that a valid argument, yet aggressively ignore even the notion of questioning said belief.
We had no offense  The team was still eight and one  Is it safe to hope? November the fifth  Sandusky destroyed Penn State  And got Joe Pa fired Sputtering finish  Joe Paterno's in the ground  Things can't get much worse...
So you seriously don't even ahve to cook the shit? You can just eat it straight pretty much? Is there a difference in the effect when you eat it straight vs. making something like a firecracker? I know the firecracker worked well, but i am betting yogurt hides the taste better.
Stick Stickley was so much more boss.
don't forget that ricochet also scales with crit, and that you're getting pretty close to 1-shotting squishies with aa, ricochet, aa + q early game if you crit on one.
Uh-huh. You could've asked me about that comment first.
Someone totally did not read the comments.
This. its everywhere. my twitter timeline, my facebook timeline. way overused.
No, he doesn't.  Edit: It's not an [Aspidistra](http://www.oasisfla.com/14%20in%20Aspidistra.JPG), it's a [Janet Craig Compacta](http://carterroadtropical.com/images/8in_JC_Compacta1.JPG). Thanks for the downvotes, morons. 
I know. I was expounding. I'm an expounder.
I don't like fast vehicle spawn either. But on our servers we noticed it gets hard to keep the servers active if we do not make the vehicles spawn faster. Also, with the vanilla or slow spawn, half the team keeps camping in the base. With fast respawn, at least everybody is playing.
Really? She is a beauty now, but I thought she was very awkward looking when she was younger. Not homely but not there for her looks. 
I saw this at the Guggenheim in NYC. This guy also does a lot of art where he puts gunpowder on canvas and then lights it. The burn markings are the art. So amazing.
Amazing change! At this stage just attempt to find something fun to do as you only got those last pounds to go. :)
The Shawshank Redemption.
yep, it is entirely made up. science is "atheist trying to take over the world" 
Came here to say this. Yes! Anything with cheese. My brother had me mail him boxes of mac and cheese when he lived in China. 
I think you're confused over what is claimed as hard fact and what is speculation. I mean any show about dinosaurs would be a lot less interesting if they just slapped blobs of clay around dinosaur bones and said that's about as best as we can imagine. And it's not like science won't change its idea if more evidence comes along.
umm. you guys realize guys make noise during sex, right?
o thanx forgot about that one... D:
Worth thing you can do as Cho in a team fight: QWERQWEQWEWWE  *Ten minutes later*  Oh right, Vorpal Spikes :x
I used to live a few houses down from that place. My friends and I always thought it looked strangely out of place.
Helped lead to Hitler's rise to power. He made promises to get Germany out of their depression (though, I doubt they used this word at the time)... And hell, he didn't break that promise...
I think the ignoring may come from the fact that American tourists are notorious for being incredibly ignorant of the cultures they are visiting.  Why would you visit China (or anywhere) and expect everyone to speak your foreign language?  I personally believe that if your going to visit a country then you should adhere to their cultural standards, not the other way around.
I'm serious about records, man, I collect them and I have a couple of close friends that are also vinyl junkies who would probably help share the cost of shipping provided everyone gets to look through and pick items of interest.  They should be fine in the current storage condition, provided they haven't been exposed to drastic temperature changes (particularly focused direct sunlight, i.e. being in a car during the summer).  The only question I would have is what genres we're talking about - for example, if these are mostly church quartet or weird country (I live near Nashville, every Goodwill vinyl section is like 90% that haha) records I probably wouldn't be interested - but you said these were music lovers so I'd imagine they're probably alright.  Anyways, man, I'd absolutely love to see those go to people who really love records and not in the trash, please let me know what you decide to do and keep me in mind.
[](/wtf)
Adulterers shall free us from religion.
it's random, but not worth the risk.
* "Look what my girlfriend made for me!" * "Anyone remember this popular game from ~10 years ago? * "More games should do this [similar to above]" * "I know I'll get downvoted for this, but {popular opinion)" * "I don't know why you're getting downvoted" * "Have an upvote."
Or [Google Voice](http://voice.google.com/)
I really don't know why you feel that way.  You're in the majority in the rest of the country and Internet.  You're probably in the majority on reddit, but here atheists have a place to speak on equal footing and a higher percentage per theists than most places.   Plus, we don't come gunning for you.  We don't seek out ways to humiliate your kids when they reveal their atheism.  We don't make up lies about you to make people think you're evil.  We don't tell you you're going to hell if you don't agree with us.   We DO question your books.  We DO show the fallacies in your religious arguments.  We DO speak the truth about hypocrisy.  We DO speak the truth about following the money.  We DO speak the truth about abominations performed in the name of your gods.   But threaten violence because you don't agree with us?  Nope, sorry, that is still solely the task of the religious.  Sorry if I sound bitter, I don't mean to.  But I'm tired of being made out to be violent when in actuality I'm a very strong pacifist.
yea def check it. another issue could be if your using the same line from the wall with a normal splitter to split tv and cable, thats baaaaad. you would need a line tap, which is similar but it helps filter signal noise.
you forgot the best shore, the jersey shore.
Makes sense. I just assumed lacroat was American because of ESPN 3, that's why I said fox soccer.
Luckily, I realized all of this during the beta, so I've never actually had to pay for the game.   "We can use Star Wars brand recognition to reskin WoW and steal customers who find Warcraft material stale." That sums up TOR perfectly.   It should've been a single-player game. No, I'm not projecting some sort of MMO hate onto Bioware's product. Actually, I've played MMOs since they were MMORPGs, i.e. the days of Everquest and Ultima Online. I was hugely excited for this release; it could have been amazing. Instead, it just smacks of lazy. Rehashed game design, check. Cliché voice acting, check (let's get the immensely talented Jennifer Hale to just rehash her Commander Shepard performance instead of introducing something fresh). And cyborgs as a player race, lol wut?
Where would I find these items?
Damn!
Does it work when i rotate the screen?
Do you think everyone should learn sign language?
I don't know about any new fangled personal conveniences they give guys these days, what with one-man rooms, laundry service and what not, but back in my days at Camp Geiger the shitters were just in a naked line, no doors, walls or nothing.   Various rolls of shit paper were threaded through a bowed chain that ran the length of the crapper parade, and if you happened to sit at one on the end, a buddy needed to get up from his business and throw a roll up the chain so you could grab something to wipe with.   In a worse-case scenario you could be holed up inside an amtrack for a couple of days and have to shit inside an empty MRE pouch and pass it up to a friend to throw out the hatch when given the all-clear.  Being worried about a corpsman give your asshole a gander at the MEPS will become just a reminder of gentler times. Also, they give you meal tickets, so don't buy anything from the caf with your own money. And bring something to read.
I saw that one but it says it is not compatible with my Thunderbolt.
"Nintendo releases viral video to attract senior market!" 
The manual says that should work, but this is what I do when I don't know what method will reset a router:   - Start with the router fully powered on and started up  - Hold down the reset button for 30 seconds  - While holding down the reset button, unplug the router.  - Keep holding down the reset button for 30 seconds while the router is unplugged  - While holding the reset button, plug the router back in  - Keep holding down the reset button for 30 seconds while the router boots up  To summarize, you hold down the reset button for 90 seconds without letting go. 30 seconds while the router is on, 30 seconds while the router is off, and 30 seconds while the router is on again.  If that doesn't work, you might have a broken reset button.
Any other animals wear clothes to survive the climate on land ? That's what I thought, dumbass...  Once again someone on tv proves common sense is not common.
I will if i can find out when they are going to do it. It's been sitting for awhile.
Holy shit! How amazing was LSD's set finishing right as the sun went down and going directly into Daft Punk?! I'll never forget that day. And TV on the Radio right before LSD across the field! 
Yup. Hey, you were accused of murder! Let's not bother with a trial - most people accused of murder actually committed it so let's just ship you straight to death row!
everyone in my family sleeps with their heads under the blanket. I'm not sure about them but I do it because I'm concerned about earwigs or cockroaches deciding to inhabit my inner ear whilst I slumber
My ass. He'll be back, he'll work his way back
So is this a problem with the actual product, or on a per-device basis?
Hmm, the advice of a veteran should not be ignored. Perhaps I'll just make the drill arm for fun. 
i was reading ur comment and i was like...TREES COME ONE and then u said it and i was all like das mah ENT
Was there any observable flight irregularities? Did it feel as if the plane was on manual control instead of Autopilot during the time you saw these? 
a hopeful start
I'm so glad my friend and I aren't the only ones that thought this scene was ridiculous beyond belief
if i don't see cringing in your next vid, i'm going to assume that you have skin (or balls) of steel.
Actually more people play the 1.6 cs version on the pirated version pc ... i have no doubt
Do you have any kids?
Goldson broke up a second interception with Carlos Rodgers, again due to his lack of awareness. Had he not taken Brown out of the game, I don't think Eli comes alive for that brief period.  And yeah, I can forgive the miff. Honestly, I'm more disappointed in the stripped fumble. But it should never have been close enough for Williams (or anyone else) to lose the game. Team lost. Williams was just the most visible.
It's hardly opinion when the White House contacts a Reuters partner, TheWrap, via email and lets them know that Google was selecting the questions to be asked:  FTA:  &gt;...the White House did send an email to TheWrap earlier in the day noting that decisions on the questions asked would be made by Google.  Sorry, but that's a statement of fact - not an opinion. Cognitive dissonance much?  But, you just carry on with your willful ignorance and denial if it comforts you, mate.  Still doesn't change the facts, though. Sorry 'bout that. Too bad, so sad.
I believe so, every Wednesday night at 7. After a probationary period, they'll give you a key so you can go in whenever you want.
"And so I run to you, with broken arms" - probably one of my favorites.  Also, "Is your man, 84? If he ain't, lemme know".
I'm afraid I just blue myself.
Sabbatical is for important people with responsibility.  The word you're looking for is binge.
I came here to point out enfuse. Please post the results for comparison. I haven't been able to find a picture where I can do significantly better manually than enfuse does.
How dare her ignore your wet clothes and clean up the dangerous slip-hazard you created.
It's really not that remarkable of a series other than the nice boat/general unraveling of the main characters near the end.  It's more of an anime that you'd watch for "academic purposes." eg. because it has a reputation rather than "hey this looks like a neat show."  As for the op, Afterstory is similar to Air, Kanon or ef a tale of memories.
Nope, they are the bare naked shitter kind
Where's Gimli when you need him?
Ok... I won't get in the details of it, not here. But I'll give you some hints. You need to execute a js function on form submission, cancel submission and then send the data in an ajax way.  This link shows you how to cancel form's submission (basicly you just need to return false from the js function that handles this event). http://www.htmlcodetutorial.com/forms/_FORM_onSubmit.html  This one will show you how to send the post using ajax: http://www.openjs.com/articles/ajax_xmlhttp_using_post.php   Anyways I would recommend using some js library, my choise is always mootools. Any other question please send me a private message.
It's the kind of thing that is immediately obvious as absolutely necessary after you've seen a good use of it, but might seem useless until then.  Until that point happens, you can just pretend that it doesn't exist.  When the need arises, it will be there waiting.
Downvoting because you disagree.  It's not the downvote I care about.. it's the fact that I don't know did it so I can't tell them what downvoting just because they disagree says about them.
Your fellow Tennesseans are ashamed. 
See my Reply with the Facebook link.
If you have a cat that is allowed outside, isn't chipped, and **doesn't have a collar**, you are a bad cat owner.  A collar is how everyone is supposed to know that the cat has an owner, and should have some identifying information on a tag. Collars come off, so the cat should also be chipped, which will identify the owner if the cat is ever found even without the collar.  My cats are indoor cats but they *still* have chips, tags, and collars just in case they get out of the house and get lost. If you love your cats and don't want them to get lost or "adopted" by someone else, you should do the same.
Otherwise known as Tiger Bread, and soon to be known world wide as Giraffe Bread.  Just sayin'...
I'm in Narnia, actually.
From a female: I don't pay much attention to where a man keeps his wallet, but I'd notice if he looks like he can't remember where it is or like it's making him uncomfortable.   As for how thick it is, I would clean it out a bit; make sure there's nothing in there that you don't need.   Or you could always get a sex-change so you can carry a purse without fear of looking less manly!
You're welcome. 
sounds horribad
Beep Beep Back it up back it up Beep Beep Back it up Back it up.
Indeed, pardon my misleading phrasing :)
this
Looks like a trap.
You spelled tomato the same both times but i pronounced them differently in my head. WTF o.O
Lost Russel Wilson?  Your job's still safe O'Brien,  just beat UNC.
Interesting.  Maybe if they have air circulation going it would even it out?  By the way, your tags, what does Solar Astrophysics have to do with Computer Vision?  Are you working on two different fields?
And then when he's actually supposed to start hitting the cymbal he plays the bongos... what the fuck.
&gt; Given that a few minutes without oxygen will give you severe brain damage  ... in a brain that's metabolising at full speed, rather than being in some kind of stasis...
you should cross post this to [/r/truegaming](/r/truegaming) 
* One Hundred Pushups! (Split into sets. You deserve it you lazy bitch.) * 50 crunches (Don't you want sexy abs?) * Eat extra calories and protein (To repair damage done to muscles.) * Drink lottsa water (Muscles are 80% water.) * Finish XML review (Otherwise no one will hire you.) * Finish 1/4 of Java review (To finish that project you started last year.) *Submit to [/r/SketchDaily](/r/SketchDaily). (Your drawing skills are going down the drain, mate.) 
Dang, why does it have to be the one on Tryon and Harris lol.  The one at Church &amp; 3rd my friend is the kitchen manager and I go there constantly (Going sunday for Super Bowl).
I just listened to an episode of This American Life about this the other day!  Very interesting.  Are as much under-aged workers in the factories as I've heard?  (a lot)
Ha, we barely have mandatory vacation leave here. 
"blinded by the light, revved up like a douche another runner in the night"  "bunghole in the jungle, and it's alright by me"
can't prove you wrong on the WBKO front. they're still not reporting it. wtf?
something about their playing is too predictable for me. Definitely good at what they do. Just kinda boring
*"Unprofessional"* ... how?  Please give an example of a successful terrorist attack on American soil prior to 9/11.
A Radeon 4850 gets just under 40fps at 1080p on low settings. I guess pretty well means "just about", especially at that settings, at it being a 4830 instead of 4850. Lets also not forget 40fps is average so as much as you will get 60fps when hugging a rock you will also get &lt;20fps during intense battles (when you really need/want the high fps).  Sure the 4830 is totally fine for Skyrim but BF3 it might be time considering upgrading - at least if you play BF3 as your main game.  http://www.tomshardware.com/reviews/battlefield-3-graphics-performance,3063-9.html
While it isn't apparently asscoiated with the Stussy clothing company, when we were kids, we all assumed it was. We just called it the "Stussy S," but apparently that's not even the case.  Anyway, it was just a stupid symbol kids liked to draw, because unless you were told how to do it a specific way, you weren't considered cool. It was one of those childhood rites* of passage that apparently spread all over the country. Up until I came to Reddit, I honestly believed it was only a local thing.
I think this article that I wrote awhile ago will help you significantly:  http://www.dotacommentaries.com/index.php/regal/4670/  Apologies in advance for the wall of text. Spacing was really weird in the Wordpress DC were using back then.
I generally avoid recommending manga for learning because it's easy to get distracted by the picture content, or to "trick" yourself into thinking you know what's going on even if you can't understand the words.  I'd never say it's not an OPTION; reading a chapter of a manga is certainly helpful in terms of giving you a sense of accomplishment, which is good for keeping up enthusiasm, but I believe there are a lot of things out there you could be reading that are much more beneficial to the learning process.
Annoying.
My husband, probably.
He would also need enough knowledge to be able to use wireshark.
At my high school, we had a similar albeit notably less passive issue with one student and what essentially amounted to the entire student body. For the two years he was at my school, student A constantly behaved as if the rules didn't apply to him and in an anti-social and criminal manner (much unlike the OP's son). The rest of the student body verbally lashed out at him quite harshly and publicly (including a facebook group that resulted in a suspension). After about two years of back and forth criminal and negligent behavior from Student A, the student body, and the administration, the "retaliation" against student A narrowed down to a few students. One day Student A had had enough of it after being verbally ridiculed and having poptarts spit in his face (instigation much?). Later that day, he stole an exacto knife from an art supplies room, snuck up behind Student B (poptart kid), and attempted to murder him by jamming it into his carotid artery. Student B nearly bled out and was in the hospital for half a week. Student A was tried as an adult (age 17) and took a plea bargain to aggravated assault with a deadly weapon (dropped the attempted murder). Now I seriously doubt OP's son would behave even close to this way, but that said, NIP THIS SHIT IN THE BUD!
good lord, can i be your friend!
I was quite surprised I had to scroll down a full page before I saw a "Chuck Testa" reference.
Lol, yeah, I got a lot of fucked-up letters from little kids while I was in the A-stan.  I wish I had saved some.  Elementary school kids say the craziest things.
It's quite alright. I'm either working or going to a hockey game tonight, so I'll be back around the same time. Edit: Also, I'll go ahead and buy the toque too so I've got a key for ya.
No... this song is in a major key.  I do love organ donor though.  Thanks anyways!
I was r/Atheism could help the poll results, since we know Civil Rights should NEVER be left up to popular vote. Currently its 82% sayings it should be left up to a vote. 
Slowly roast it over an open flame for 30-45 min until golden brown... That'll do 'er.
I just felt nostalgic for my old car.
High Heels, dangerous and unpractical.
Jaw-droppingly attractive.  You set my nether-regions ablaze, and my mouth water.  Goodness gracious, boy.
Being a health nut, coffee and cigarettes.
Make pit stop in Plymouth, steal nuclear arsenal, profit!! 
Because I eat duck and quail eggs, so it's habit for me to clarify which kind of eggs I want.
Mr. Happy Fun time guy, What do you think about the Beretta 92FS?
Maybe they are cousins?
i don't know if i hate you more for attempting rl rage faces, or myself for knowing you were attempting rl rage faces
"like an asshole"?????  his "dad" fucking blew the family off with no contact for 12 fucking years!
If its wrong I don't want to be right.
The secure and reliable answer is actually paper ballots. They really are more reliable in a lot of ways.
Me neither, if true they're going to get a major smackdown from datatilsynet.
One of these things is not like the other...
&gt; there is "looks good to some people, doesn't look good to other people"  FTFY, at least that's what I belive.  Ok I will stop now. It's just a bloody sweater at the end of the day.
Yeah, I saw that, but aren't they stuck with the current format till 2016 when the current TV deal expires?   I would think the TV people would be unhappy to have the product changed  halfway through the contract.
[This](http://i.imgur.com/DvfUa.jpg).
Be as big a dick to him as you can, this is the best way to prove you really are an atheist, and therefore superior to him in every way. Then I suggest you spread that same reasonable venom on everyone you meet who believes differently.
fuck yeah, well spotted! essential.
It's so common that 'rebel leaders' help a group of people until the point at which they get personal wealth and power, then invariably screw over the people they once associated with.  Same thing happened with the ANC in South Africa.  John Pilger wrote a really interesting chapter about how Mandela and the rest of the ANC leaders got rich but screwed over all the people they were supposed to represent.  In my opinion this is just more evidence that representative democracy does not work, as currently implemented.  Politicians always screw people over once they get the chance.
[Time- Pink Floyd](http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=MYiahoYfPGk)  [Come Together- The Beatles](http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=cAmn4eMusZk)  [Patron Saint of Liars and Fakes- Fall Out Boy](http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=u__SGTJ6nSY)  These are my top 3 bands (Fall Out Boy's first two albums do have some pretty cool stuff, sorry if you don't like them) Each song is one of my personal favorites by each band. Although, they each have stuff that is just as good. 
It belongs in a museum!
lol nice!
Baseline test? In like a month right
That shit with that woman is still going on?  Good grief.  She really needs to give another atheist feminist a chance to be an attention whore.  Usually they rotate every three months or so.
Damn!
Thank you. Now I need to track down the original guy, because this **WILL** be my LP cover.
Yeah I'm the worst with endings haha, every one of my stories just ends. It's a problem. I've been trying to think of a better way to end it. I'm trying to portray Noah as a dick so maybe he can be waving at them from the boat yelling "goodbye!" hmmm that might not be so bad. 
I GO OUT OF MY WAY TO DOWNVOTE ANY COMMENT THAT MENTIONS BOULDER. AND SENTENCES OF WHICH THAT END IN PREPOSITIONS OF.  Just kidding.  Honestly, I don't think I've ever noticed.  Is it really that bad?
Apologies if you feel singled out. It's just that as a man, I know my stance on gym attire, and I've talked to several other men about gym attire so I feel like I have a consensus on their feelings. Aside from my sisters (they rarely work out), I've never spoken about the subject with women, and as I don't talk with any women at my gym who could enlighten me, I was curious.
EAGLE HAS LANDED http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=nwg1cJ7nYP8&amp;t=60s
I hate regulations on my password. Instead of letting me choose what I want my password I have to conform to arbitrary guidelines which help make sure I forget my password. 
Then why lie to do it?
If you're not wild about the price of the Tokina 11-16mm f/2.8, have a look at the Tokina 12-24 f/4. Price isn't bad.
Right. In that case you have nothing to worry about. There are red lights with cameras installed for the purpose of catching light runners, which is why I said *if*.
[Pick some cotton Toby!](/spoiler)
&gt; "Holy shit, my cat can be fucking Robocop."  Upvote!
The overall camping trip was still pretty fun, but one of the nights was pretty damn miserable. I was 15, and my friend and I got permits to hike in the Olympic forest in the PNW. I think we were going to a place called third beach. Well, we hiked about 10 miles to our campsite, got absolutely shitfaced drunk on patron, and went to sleep in our tent. We were on the beach, but high enough that the water wouldn't come to us, or so we thought. There must have been a fucking storm in the middle of the night, because at 4am, I wake up sleeping in at least 5" of water. I sit up, and my friend had vomited in his sleep, and mixed with the sea water, so that was extra nice. I wake his ass up, we get out of our tent. The wind is at least 40mph, with gusts of 60 or so. We're completely soaked, and colder than shit. The wavers are crashing against our tent. We drag our tent up to where the fire was, and for an hour try to start a fire. All of our matches were soaked and useless, but there were just a few tiny embers left from the previous night. The problem is all the firewood is soaked as well. My friend and I set off barefoot in the woods in nothing but boxers, finding twigs and whatever we can to start the fire. It took us an hour, but we eventually started it, and got a raging fire going. There we were, mostly naked, holding our sleeping bags over the fire trying to dry them out. We eventually dried our shit, and got back to sleep under a tarp, but this was 3 hours later or so.
That's hardly something most people can replicate.
i read that as "be baked when i get home"
I loved it when I lived in Alaska and could tease Texas about its small size.
I saw relentless force. The ability to get up and soar and crash and get up again, like an inner ocean current. I'm exhausted right now though and the idea of something animalistic and innate like that just seems comforting. I really love the snarling wolves, too, looking up before it dashes across the room again.
you may enjoy r/nosleep
wohhhhhhh i cant even uptoke this... kinda similar to water boarding cut this shit out
UPVOTES from AhChoo, ChaChee and Bo in East Lansing MI!!
not gonna lie.. tldr. sorry bud
lol and you give a fuck about your mom why?
We've both got it ;) you are sexy as hell! keep posting
Great album, was going to post this
There's often a disconnect between the civil and structural drawings. "Here, drill this pile directly into this storm sewer"
(sigh) Jesus Christ, lol!
I hit the 4 button once,  **ONCE**
Taking the one-eyed monster to the optometrist. 
I was bout to say something about how this kinda drug on then i saw your username :&gt;
How exactly has anything involving the vatican been going on for tens of thousands of years?
It's not for medicines and stuff. [You can even get paid for it](http://www.trials4us.co.uk/) (NB don't know the site in particular; it was just a random example, don't blame me if they take both of your kidneys and leave you bleeding out in an alleyway).  It is for some things though. Like testing the reactions of cars in a crash etc; crash test dummies are much cheaper anyway, even if the results aren't quite as accurate perhaps.  Give a little more detail on what sort of thing you're asking about.
I was bullied in highschool. My dad kept telling me "bong you gotta fight back, beat them, beat them for as long as you can until a teacher pulls you off of them" my mom kept telling me "bong have you tried talking to them? Telling them you know this hurts me." Obviously talking to them didn't work. So I beat them severely. What I'm trying to say is your kid needs to assert his dominance over these people by beating them. Not whooping thier ass, not scrapping, I mean leave a mark on thier lives, something to remember. Beat them severely so they will remember your son is the alpha dog.
A few years ago (I wanna say 2009ish) I saw your show in Ames, IA with Michael Whisler. First off: HOLY COW! You are amazing! As is Mr Whisler.   Will we be hearing any Andy McKee tunes featuring some slide guitar awesomeness?
i get mana on veno if i have the money cos you need to meka/pipe.  sven really really needs manaboots so he can actually gank so yeah.
Pretty much yes. My solution was rarely striking back but to wait until they got cocky and then boar rushes down mountains on that bitch.
I'll admit, the findings of Solberg &amp; Laughlin are compelling, although I wish there was more than just one study on it.  I'd be curious to know, for the 9 categories of benefits (retirement benefits, life insurance benefits, medical benefits, dental benefits, training/education benefits, profit sharing, maternity/paternity benefits, flexible work hours, and employer-subsidized child care), the idea is that women accept lower wages to gain higher fringe benefits in these areas?  I was under the impression that wages-benefits were not a zero sum game and that things like medical &amp; dental were choices outside of and not related to choices on wages.  But I could just be speaking of my own industry and not familiar with others.  Thank you for sharing the study.  Having said that, there are still a number of citations in the wikipedia article that seem to refute the findings.  For instance, the "Motherhood penalty and men's marriage premium" section is very revealing.
A picture which I had honestly never even seen before. And one that is not worth the pain having of having to describe.
my pet peeve is the water that soaks in. That's my issue.  Besides, i have suede boots that aren't uggs. They're actual fur-lined winter boots, and they can get stained as well. I'm still breaking the one pair (with a waterproof shoe part) in though, so i have to decide between water stains and leaks or being in pain as I try to break a new pair of shoes in.
Really nice!
I see.  Well, one good turn deserves another, as they say.
Where can we, as fans, go to show support for Derpy?  We need to fight!  EDIT: Does anyone know the contact info for Amy Keating Rogers?
I've got a question for you guys. What if we were to map all your emotes to equivalent ones we have here.  So all the rainbow dash ones, for example, we'd try to find the most matching rainbow dash, and set it in our CSS.  Blank posts would no longer be an issue (there would be an equivalent in-sub emote shown) and you guys can still use whatever emote you would like.  Is this idea worth exploring?  It came from circlejerk, who redirected all of our emotes to [this image](http://c.thumbs.redditmedia.com/NR9Jp7WrOSsD7jFJ.png) so that users wouldn't see blank posts when using mlp emotes. [Here's their stylesheet](http://www.reddit.com/r/circlejerk/stylesheet.css), ctrl+f flutterfear.  I'd love to hear from all of you, so please link this idea around.  There are a few issues with this idea. First is, the CSS will be much longer. It's also going to be very challenging for us to keep up with you guys. But if the burdeon is on us, we'd prefer it over sacrificing usability for our users, both those who want to user out of sub emotes, and those who hate seeing blank posts.  edit: after deliberation it was decided that this would be too demanding in practice. Back-end is much too complicated. This idea is shelved for now.
Apparently you think intelligence = skill.  I mean, if you are intelligent, you should be able to just pick up a flute and bang out a nice tune, right?  Do you really not see the flaw in your logic here?
There won't be spreadsheets because the difficulty will be in reactive gameplay not dps but there will probably be cookie-cutter compositions for the harder content.  
Didn't see any real situational picks mentioned so...  THD - tanky support that destroys towers with passive and deals mass aoe to creeps. Good for 15-20min strats.  Ogre magi - smoke gank/tower dive support who is tank like THD.  Every hero fits a unique role, that's what I like about DotA the most. There are legitimately situations where one hero is stronger that the status quo.
This is the stuff that violent revolutions are made of.  People that have nothing to lose will do unexpected things.
Just for the record, there definitely are stupid questions.
But is the goal really the safety of astronauts, or the success of missions? The precautions seem pretty much the same either way. 
AHA!  That drop hahahaha wow. I guess if you live in a city this would be a great adaptation.
I disagree, there was a ton of effort put into that plan, it just wasn't effort by who they told you did it. Doesn't matter, America is destroying itself just fine.
zelda
You've made my day, it's usually only the southerners that get the love. 
mine did not come with one,luckily one came with the case i bought.
Yeah, they were making monocoques and suspension members from it by that stage. McLaren had Hercules making CF tubs for them, I believe.
It happened to my brother. He spent close to thirty years as musician more like twenty as a pro but he got disgusted an quit for about ten years and is finding his way back to it after a long break. The industry model is awful and places too little value on talent.   Never sell short what you have done. As an ardent music lover with little talent for instruments people like you amaze me. You put your soul out there and I am sure you touched some people who will never forget your music.   That being said take your time and find something else you enjoy doing and do it. You never know musical styles change and you may be in demand yet. Never quit your music, but don't be afraid to step back and do something else.  I wish you all the best on focusing your talent where you need to be right now.
Totally agree. The extent to which Reddit and Imgur are complicit in profiting off of the the work of others without those others benefiting is borderline unethical. I was hoping for eho.st to take off as a compromise of sorts.
What are you trying? Would be helpful to know what you've already tried to throw some more ideas at you.
Instead of 12,995.00 SK NOW JUST 12,995.00 SK !!!! what a steal  btw: you are not european, you are scandinavian. huge difference. nobody associates iceland with europe.
Don't try to make sense of our pronunciation rules.  Just don't.
B. If we set the the orange portal as the (moving) reference point on a coordinate system then the cube will enter it at the same speed the "pump" is moving.  The vector of the cube will be pointing upwards and having the same velocity.
We should collab and make a few pieces expressing our new found appreciation for the circlejerk!
Here, let me downvote that for you.
You forgot to mention that it's important to keep an eye out on your mutas.... beware of stim marines!
Yeah, and also... what other possible crime does he finance with that money?   Nah, legalization would solve everything.
So who ever edited the pic to hide the names did a pretty shit job.
While this is cool it gave me an idea of something better.   **Aperture Science doormat.**
I praise nobody. God wasn't there to help me, his son. But I was rebuilt. They had the technology
Bummer if this is true.  I thought the game may have been a fun joint, not to take too seriously, but this more than solidifies my choice just to wait for Ultimate/Super edition that would hopefully include everything.  Or hell, just not buy it all together.
For clarification: one of our teammates told us that nukes are pretty useful even in high masters TvZ matches, so one of us went and tried some... After few missed and denied nukes, few finally hit and that was the best one.  Teammate who did this has ~800 points and 200 bonus pool, so I guess his opponent was about 1k points masters on EU.
Why did people downvote this? Beautiful truth coupled with hilarious username. I dig it.
If the wound on your finger wasn't open, I don't see why it would be.  Disclaimer: I am not a doctor.
ok- http://steamcommunity.com/profiles/76561198038388513
Well it is the internet, can never really tell what's intentional and not.
of course! I'll be sure to PM you when I get some.
You would think they could find someone in the party in Iowa that can count.  Never mind it's republicans.
Uhh, looks like Tesco chocolate spread and pancakes to me?
In response to the questions of stability in the Big 12, would adding these two schools, along with the recent additions, not signify a serious boost in overall conference stability? I get that in 2011, the B12 was a ticking time-bomb sitting on the brink for months, but schools have been added, contracts have been signed, etc.   It's completely feasible that the conference reestablishes it's position as a strong, stable, and competitive football conference, especially given that we already have 2 of the 3.
If a person says to his brother, O KAFIR (disbeliever) ! Then surely one of them is such. (i.e; Kafir) (Sahih Bukhari Volume 8 Book 73 Number 125) (edit: there is another one that states this hadith's saying more clearly, bassically, the penelty for doubting someone's belief, is loss of your own, incase anyone was wondering)  Firstly, whether they are within the fold of islam or not is not a decision you or I can make. Personally, however I feel about a person, I will not risk my own deen for a stab at someone else.   Secondly, whether they are muslim or not is irrelevant. If this was a hate crime against muslims, then I can garentee you they didnt research whether Ahmadiyas were actually muslim by any definition or not, and if as humanism says, this was a roving gang of sunnis, then it's Still a hate crime that is to be deplored... and they did it under the name of islam.  In Either case, this post belongs on r/islam. Take care, Salaam
You seem to be really positive despite what's happened to you.. How often do you get depressed about it?  Do you think that being optimistic is a choice you had to make to survive, or a trait you naturally have?
The right way to do it, unless you are in fact left handed or Marvin Hagler.
There's a really good [support article on setting up profiles](http://support.mozilla.org/en-US/kb/Managing-profiles).  It's worth checking out.
Any Skyrim is too much as far as I'm concerned.
I would certainly expect a pressurized shock to work better with the correct amount of air pressure in it, but, if I was you, I would be trying to identify what the shock is before putting too much air in it and blowing out the seals.
I work(ed) in real estate since forever. My dad owned a real estate company too. This is why I became aware of the fraud that was taking place on a massive scale on a first person basis. I remember hearing about people obtaining loans that were impossible to pay back in 2004/5, &amp; then learning how bubbles worked. By 2006/7 I was calling the collapse of the dollar back then &amp; my friends &amp; family were looking at me like I had 3 heads. Now that things are a little more mainstream they only look at me like I have 2 heads. Go figure.
MOM HIGH FIVE, just let me put down these grocery bags and feed the dogs first.
Looks like we managed to completely ruin the poll. It's already at 80%.
This is already on the front page of this subreddit.  You should feel bad.  &amp;#3232;\_&amp;#3232;
You mean all three of them? 
Waiting on my plates. Yes they are horrifying.
Just seeing it for the first time was totally awesome. Can't wait to live near there. :3
There was more that I said than just that...  I think you're oversimplifying. 
If i had to guess, I think his Strangelove-equivilent would probably be War On Terror-themed...And no less awesome then the original Dr. Strangelove was.
Aw no one should down vote you for being my best friend. I can make a superb plate of nachos to make up for it.
Why? I grew up idolizing guys like Grant Brittain and Mike Blabac and loved seeing their work. A lot of great shots have been captured with a fisheye. Not all, clearly. There's as many, or more, great photos that are just standard wide angle shots, but the distorted fisheye shots made up a distinct look of 90's skateboard pictures. Maybe they still do, I haven't really paid much attention for a while. 
Happened to me in July. Never fixed it and it's still going strong!
Looks a lot like Sharpay from HSM.
Maybe but we're talking about software that matters here
Nah I mean having common interests in a relationship are GREAT but basing a relationship on *we both post on reddit* is kind of creepy weird.
Yes, but the costume has nothing to do with her whatsoever...
&gt; CK had numerous bugs and a crappy UI, but the level editors are paid to put up with all its quirks.   I've done game development.  This is true.  Half of your job is learning to work *around* the tools you are given.  It is tough and buggy.  But the machine you are working on isn't actually yours (most of the time), and you're usually assumed to be a relatively computer savvy person.  Plus, yeah, you're being paid.  If the tools I have used in the past were released to the public the companies would have been sued into the ground for releasing software that destroyed people's "personal computers."  At the job, the database manager crashing and corrupting your game files (or system files, heaven forbid) is obnoxious, but fixable.  You reinstall whatever you need from some version controlled master 'base or disc and move one.  That's called Tuesday.  You learn never to get too attached to anything on your system.  Especially when they can come by, while you're typing, and take away your computer and give you a new one and you have no valid arguments against it.
 *Personally I've felt that LEGO has moved away from creativity and now just send out model kits.*  Of course you feel this way because you haven't actually looks at the Lego site to see that you are wrong. 
what does this have to do with the OP's post at all?
That's exactly how Barry is. Gavin and Stacey is like your neighbours through the window, ya know, if they were with an English guy. 
after living a full year with a douche of a roomate that constantly blasts awful country songs like that fucking "Jolene" god awful piss poor inexcusably bad piece of fucking shit song... and singing them at the top of his lungs - yes I can see how this statistic rings true.
&gt;Kaffir is just the raw face of Israel.  Suddenly this meme goes from funny to 100% probable. 
Piercings!!! Earrings are okay on girls. And MAYBE the ocassional, SUBTLE nose ring, but come on.
i would erase, Heroes because i grew up reading comics, and watching that show i wished that i could wake up randomly with super powers :D, and also the book endurs game, absolutely LOVED that book, simply amazing 
IMO both.
I think it's often the problem of EU structures that is causing the problem. It is evolving as an organisation and maybe this will improve in future.  As for the cultural clashes, obviously the bigger the EU gets, the more voices come into play. For such a big organization to work, there must be the will of the politicians to achieve consensus on difficult issues. That's not always possible, unfortunately. Call me an optimist, but I think if they got down to it, it's likely it would work out to the benefit of all.
Well I hadn't been... because when I change proxy settings in network preferences to connect to my proxy without this app I've never had to restart Safari... but I tried anyways, still no go. :-(
! lets do it.. some fellow summoners and i just transferred here :) we play pretty srs but not a lot of ranked.. we have a vent (better than skype) but it could help our team, imo, if we all met up somewhere to play.. my summoner name is Colatic.. msg me or continue this thread :) 
Bob Marley tingz
I was literally falling asleep but I had to wake up and laugh at that.
The salesmen would convince the party goers to battle one another by offering a one time only exclusive price. Once all the cars are totaled in the mess, the insurance company buys them. The ultimate close.   Well that's what I would do. ABC fellows.
How is this in any way, shape, or form related to Starcraft?
This anticipated reveal rivals "The Third Man" for the greatest in history. 
No offense but if cops were not in schools an incredible amount of violence would take place in some areas. Where I went to middle school and high school kids kicked the hell out of each other, teachers, and employees. Kids would have brought MORE guns and other weapons if there was not a resource officer there to keep some of them in check. It would be nice if bullying was the only thing we had to worry about in school.
if you do it well, this hits at 13 minutes, before the unit, upgrade, or tech tree is really that established.
What I want to know is...  Is Roger actually a real person? Does roger have an iPad, and iPhone and and iPod? Does Roger smoke?
hothothothothothothothothothothothothothothothothothot.
I have +3 fire skills circlet and amulet, you can have it for free :) although I wouldn't mind a 4os pala shield if you have
You deserve all the upvotes my friend. You made my night, and possibly the nights of a few of the 71 people following me on Twitter.
UNDERwhere?
I tried to make this same point when talking to someone who said there is a recent "trend" of discrimination against Christians. His was response was "True, practicing Christians drops that percentage quite a bit."  They are impervious to logic.
Visual Boy Advanced and just search on google for roms
That's a comical way to lose your faith. 
Jimmy Hoffa?
You shouldn't have to ask if the manga is ahead of the anime, inherently it has to be.
beginning your comment with "this will probably get buried but..." makes me want to bury your comment. but you did give good advice.   *ascii art neutral thumb*
My church did not take a literal interpretation of the Bible.  They were willing to accept that some stories were just stories.  The finer point regarding who did what action amongst the holy trinity is really more of a Catholic concern.  No, they did not threaten children with Hell, ever.  The closest they would come to it is to tell us we didn't need to be afraid of death.  All you have to do is let the love of Jesus into your heart, and you would have eternal life in heaven.  They didn't really get into the contrary. If you read the bible, it doesn't really discuss hell very much either.  The concept of fire and brimstone scary Hell and Satan was something that became popular in the early church after the books of the bible had been written.  It was a way to scare ignorant people into converting to this new fangled religion.  It was then further expanded in novels like Paradise Lost, and further pushed during the Christian revival periods.  While it wasn't the official stance of the church, many church-members felt you didn't even have to believe the whole "jesus christ is the only son of god who died on the cross to have our sins forgiven" thing to get into heaven.  You just had to be a good and loving person.
YES.
There are a lot of side effects, some good (reduced periods, reduced cramps), some bad (just like the pill). Honestly... talk to a doctor about it. I haven't had any issues from it, personally.
Sounds like you opened a can of worms, son. Next time keep yur yap shutty
I totally feel you on the spy issue, frilly. If any team member wastes too much time on a spy, the spy has won. I try to maneuver myself in comp to get in peoples way a lot, try to draw them in. One Soldier trying to track me down behind enemy lines, is one less Soldier my team has to deal with.  I think our comms weren't TOO bad. People were definitely calling things out, problem is I couldn't understand a thing of it because we had to drop mumble and use in-game chat. Our caller and others were having trouble with it. With everyone talking, it just sounded like gibberish during the game.
i'll play gears with with you! my gamertag is WRappiii
[](/grumpypie) It begins.
Wow, thanks.  I appreciate your upvote more than usual!
Can't you just go without?
[FIXED](http://memegenerator.net/instance/13885207)
Well yes but all they combat that is with they're right to kick me out of the house if i don't obey
The one that wanted to hold the wealth at the top rather than... trickled it down.
In a free market you choose to use or purchase a given product or service. This is getting to vote too. The public votes everyday with their money about which goods or service they choose to use. The more successful ones live on, the unsuccessful should die off. 
Dana Carvey stand up, bit about how you can't sound sober when you say it
The difference there is because I typed "New Zealand is" and you only typed "New Zealand". Another interesting one is ["Kiwis are"](http://i.imgur.com/SgRUO.png).  EDIT: I wonder if these kinds of search results tend to be negative because people are more likely to search to confirm negative opinions/feelings, as opposed to positive opinions/feelings which we tend to be more confident in and don't require others to affirm our stance to the same extent.
All the area north of the highway, and I think technically everything west of 176 but I'm not sure, on this map: http://g.co/maps/pf479.  Reachable by 160 St. overpass, 156 St. underpass, and from the East, which makes it sort of an island within Surrey.  Big houses, low crime, stereotype is that every second house is Korean, reality is that the stereotype underestimates :).
Thanks I appreciate your input. I really did just want more people to see it and that's why I clearly stated it was a repost. If I wanted I could've just posted it again and gotten way more Karma for it, but I didn't. 
maybe he had a dream of going back as bones
TIL never give advice on EDMPRODUCTION
That's pretty creepy yeah write more!
That's what I thought it may be. I asked her if it was contagious etc. He was sneezing - that is the only other symptom. He did have some grey goo on the corner of his eye for a few days but it went away. I am going to look at his eye again when I get home.  She said I could put the lysine paste in both of their food if I wanted to. It smells like bacon.   I also quit giving them popular treats. Most of the cat treats out there also are made with grains and corn syrup,etc. Now I only buy them 100% pure freeze dried liver and give it to them a couple times a week. 
[my troll](http://i.imgur.com/AbXdN.png)
It's the only thing relevant to whether or not she'll be able to continue the relationship with him realistically. Anyone can put in any amount of effort after infidelity. If the wronged party can't move on, then there is no relationship left. I'm sorry that my opinion offended you so much that you felt the need to personally attack me, I was just trying to share what I thought was the best advice based on my experience. No matter what he does at this point, now that she knows what happened, if she can't see herself getting over it then there is no future.
He's not doing a very good job at it.
Parachutes - Coldplay
I used to have a Siamese named Sugar. Maybe that?
Actually it's pretty much the same thing. My fiance and I wouldn't be allowed to marry not too long ago because we are different races, who the hell has the right to say who you can and can't marry.
Looks like somebody forgot to talk to the old man before using FLY ;-P
but does it make you a car if you park in a garage?
Hey guys! In this thread let's talk about what we despise about other people! It's going to be fun guys! 
I've had flavours, now. There's no going back.
The best part about being an "artist" of stuff like this, is that if someone says "hey, that looks *really* shitty, and is absolutely garbage," is that you can just say that person doesn't get it.
It's bacon so...your point is invalid
Yes, they couldn't but it's not needed to make the connection between death and a big mass that's usually not there in humans.
...what happens on the 29th feb?
Paul Ryan
I'm a reasonably intelligent chimpanzee so I will be sure to give this a whirl. This is precisely the info I was looking for thank you so much. 
I'm going to guess 8.
Fuck that. I'm going to swing for the fences 
The girls always say "be nice" as if to say "I know I'm hot but I need you to tell me"
Technically I just started open about it. I only told others I was Christian so I wouldn't be ostracized...
Its not about not having the money, its about not having cash. I generally dont carry cash so I would have to go to the ATM get a 20, then go find somewhere to break the 20, then go back to the coke machine. Me personally, I'd rather just use a debit card.
I sincerely hope we don't evolve backwards lol.  That little dude is still essentially very much like us, nothing majorly interesting is capable of happening in a million years. 
Los Feliz is a minefield of broken sidewalks and dreams.
Oklahoma City Bombing cover up? Must everything be a fucking conspiracy? You've got to be fucking kidding me.
The OP was a 17 year old kid who hadn't seen his dad in a decade when daddy tried to be "involved" by adding him on Facebook. When the OP was older, and like most people, more mature after leaving their teenage years and seeing a friend in similar circumstances go through the loss of an absentee parent and how it hurt them, he tried to reconcile. Assuming the father wasn't a teenager and hadn't been for some time, it would be the right thing to do to try to reconcile then. The dad is a childish asshole, in other words. The OP here was, too, but he had an excuse: he was a child.
&gt;120 hours  Casual.
".....half"
Don't be silly, a child born in 1997 would be far too young to be posting on...  ... Fuck.
maybe a regional difference? I'm from rural nothern new england where the deer herd is relatively sparse (hard winters and big woods) and deer hunting is hard and involves covering miles on the mountain. We recently took our first hunting trip out to the midwest and shot like 4 deer in a few days, just by sitting in stands, it was ridiculous. Around here deer will certainly return to a general bedding area but don't care whether or not they are laying back down in the same specific spot. I guess I should admit that it could be different elsewhere..
I'm hoping Brett Gardner will finally turn into the star top of the order guy hitting over 300, on basing close to 400 and stealing 50 whilst manning left field like a champ.  p.s. Also learning how to bunt effectively will help him a long way towards this goal allowing the bunt for a base hit to be a potent weapon.
You never know. Punching a woman for not making dinner is way different from punching a bitch who's attacking a kid in a grocery store. Context matters.
Well, you know what they say!
couldn't care less
Respecto a las comidas, depende mucho de lo que comas. Por ejemplo, un almuerzo típico (ej un plato de ravioles) en un supermercado o una panadería te sale entre 80 y 130 pesos (4 y 6,5 dólares) dependiendo de la calidad. Obviamente si compras tu propia comida y cocinas tu mismo vas a ahorrar bastante plata. Yo calculo que con 15 dólares diarios deberías ser capaz para 3 comidas.  En Montevideo no hay subtes por lo que el transporte publico se reduce a autobuses y taxis. Un pasaje de autobus cuesta hoy 18 pesos, casi 1 dolar.  No estoy seguro a que te referís con "casa de asistencia". Me imagino que estas pensando en un lugar donde quedarte a dormir. Le pregunte a un compañero sobre esto y me dijo que los precios arrancaban en los 4 mil pesos por mes. Eso seria algo así como 200 dólares. Capaz algún otro  redditor uruguayo te podrá aconsejar mejor en este aspecto.  Las cosas electrónicas (computadoras, etc) son -en general- caras.  No se me ocurre que mas contarte!
But don't you think that 65%+ of reddit submissions are as equally absurd and cries for attention? I'm glad to see redditors raged up at this because it's useless, lowest common denominator bullshit but I'd REALLY like to see more of a backlash when desperate, needy people try to use reddit as their facebook annex and pretend that anyone gives a flying fuck about the photo they took of their 'friend' with a pizza box on his head.  Fucking neediness. Most of you have it.
I'm trying to describe it. It seems to lack authenticity, or emotion. It's the same reason many people prefer film. This is a bit of a compromise, as it combines the cheapness and convenience of digital with the look of film. Obviously, it's only my preference, and one that many redditors do not share.
Which in turn cites a peer reviewed journal.
Who gives a fuck what they are, **they taste 'good' to me** and that's all I give a fuck about. Everyone is aware they're not apples.  'Stop liking things I don't like'.
I'll just repeat that. We get **paid** for getting our higher education.
only to be outdone by the period farts  - bwhahaha - good god I love this subreddit! 
Hot!
I have 2nd gen with 4.2.1 and it is not compatible. I guess it doesn't work with any gen, apart from 4 and 5 (Need someone to confirm this)
I made this account way back when for posting opinions so I wouldn't have my main deluged with abusive condescending orangereds. Since I was making it for discussion, I wanted to call it something tongue-in-cheek related to arguments. I thought of Unfounded Accusations, and then I just jumped to UnboundedAccusations (as in, "do his scandalous accusations know no bounds?! GASP").  After a while, I realized that I probably shouldn't be posting Reddit comments on an account with my real name in it (which my first was), so I switched to using this one full time.  [](/dumbfabric) Ta-da!  Though, unfortunately, when making up the name, I didn't think I would need something that could be shortened (which it does since I do Livestream party things). That's the one thing I'm disappointed about with it, the shortest thing that makes sense is "Boundy" which is still not very short, to make it shorter you have to start saying things like "UnAc", which nobody could easily tell refers to me.  [](/rarityannoyed) But I've made a few contacts and established the dirty rag I hesitantly call a "reputation", so humph.
It all depends on what type of battle you're fighting. Bow troops are far more useful in siege attack and defense scenarios. Field battles are a mixed bag for bows (you can do some good work if the enemy camps on a hill but otherwise they'll get only a few volleys off).  The best scenario of all (for bow troops) is the siege attack. With proper maneuvering, they can empty their quivers and significantly soften up the defenders. The key to all this is to use a yari ashigaru to distract the enemy bow and move the rest of your army to the other side of the fort. This will allow you to fire at the defenders without risk of reprisal.  In the case of siege defense, bows are used to man the walls (obviously) and must retreat when the enemy nears the top of the wall, allowing the stronger melee fighters to take over.  In field battles (assuming the enemy doesn't just charge you) you can exploit the AI (just as you can in siege attack). The key to this is to perform a series of skirmishes with your bows, drawing individual enemy units away from the main army. Once these units are separated from the main body, they can be surrounded and crushed.  In the case that an enemy is charging you during a field battle, the best you can hope for is to position your bows on the edge of a cliff facing the enemy. In the best case scenario, the enemy can be fired upon continuously from above while your melee troops hold them at bay. In the worst case scenario, your bows can fire a few volleys from the front of your army before retreating behind the lines (a skirmish).
So this guy also wrote about  [Florence](http://www.newworldeconomics.com/archives/2007/061707.htm), where I happen to live. The centre of Florence is made of extremely narrow streets and he loves it. I can tell you that it's nice when you are a tourist but it sucks to live in central Florence. It's almost impossible (and often illegal) to drive there and there are barely any buses, which makes it extremely difficult for handicapped people to live there for example. Also there are NO GREEN AREAS whatsoever besides Boboli (where you nhave to pay to get in, and Cascine, which is kind of far away), there simply is no space. Want to sit down on a bench somewhere? Too bad, there are none. If you want to get from point A to B you have to elbow your way through koreans with cameras and drunken american teenagers, it's not much better than driving through NYC. Also the traffic just outside the center is simply awful, heavy and dangerous. That said, it's one of the most beautiful cities in the world. But it's the opposite of liveable and sustainable.
My boyfriend and I call it Lady Time. 
It's similar to Futura Black
and what sort of a nut would attack a motorhome with a camo net over it?  To my way of thinking, that would be a massive deterrent.
YOU ARE A GOD. 
"They declined, saying their son would never be involved in bullying."  I find it so funny that every parent seems to think this. Obviously some of them must be wrong.
[Which Bitch? by The View](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Which_Bitch%3F) and [Comfort In Sound by Feeder](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Comfort_in_Sound) were albums I bought at Half Price Books, because they were white vinyls, 180gm, and the covers looked intriguing.   There's also [Opiate by Tool](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Opiate_(album\)) that I bought on a whim at Hot Topic, I had heard of the album, but never heard the album itself, being a huge fan of Tool, it obviously was a good pick.  And finally there's [Contra by Vampire Weekend](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Contra_(album\)) which I admit I bought thinking it was their first album, I don't know why, and I also bought it on a whim only knowing one of their songs at all. Also a good pick!  edit: formatting
&gt;for me  Everyone has a different experience.  I do agree about the hangover, fuck my stomach... 
[This](http://www.imdb.com/name/nm0701460/) is the villain I was referring to. (It won't be a spoiler for you if you're already into the fourth season.)
Italian but maybe just because I have a couple friends who are from Italy. After that I'd say Russian.
wow, I didn't know about G+ photos. Unfortunately, I didn't have the G+ app, and I installed planB, but it was unable to turn on GPS or cell tower location, so even after sending 'locate' as an SMS, I got nothing
seems legit
Here's a little known fact about HIV transmission, It's not really spread to the masses fo fear that it might cause stupid behaviour, most learn it in med school. But fuck it you need some relief.  Insertive anal intercourse for circumcised men: 11 estimated infections per 10,000 exposures to an infected source. Smile, statistics is on your side.
I forgot to mention "sizist." People called me on that, questioning why I referred to her as "small." Too funny. 
Upvoted for the use of the word "deplorable".
Nsfw
idk if its just me cuz everyone else seems to like them, but i hate gauges, gages or however you spell the name for the apparentky gigantic ass hole people get in their ears
No one thing has ruined any of the economies listed in this image.  It's fucking trash that conservatives are passing around to circlejerk to, nothing more.
*Only a Sith deals in absolutes*^^^^^^yes^yes^irony
what do you mean by "Science of Hadith?"
The local large Shopping Centre in Coffs PBP, tried this and were less than impressed with the outcome.
Wasnt that in Japan?
Who would cross the Bridge of Death must riddle me these questions three, ere the other side he see.
hey! everyone look! it's that famous redditor! 
Bambi
&gt; The way you can claim we should be able to marry other men, someone is also able to claim they want to marry a rock  Please show me a rock that has ever given informed consent to anything.  &gt; or a dog  Again, I've never heard of a dog giving informed consent.  &gt; or 100 men  Sure, why not? As long as every one of those 100 men consents to a marriage involving 100 men, who gives a shit?  &gt; or a pillow (happened), a dead person (happened), an anime character (also happened).  Again, none of these can give informed consent. My criterion explicitly excludes these possibilities.  &gt; Today these are a minority, a novelty, exactly like homosexuality was yesterday,  Are you perhaps confusing homosexuality with overt homosexuality? Because homosexuality itself - as in, private feelings of same-sex attraction - has been at a fairly constant level for at least thousands of years.  &gt; but what about tomorrow?  Nothing. Just like giving women the vote didn't lead to giving dogs the vote, and stopping the death penalty didn't lead to letting murderers totally off the hook. The slippery slope fallacy, which seems to be the entirety of your reply, is utter bullshit.  &gt; The line's always gonna be erased and redrawn based on convenience because marriage is purely a social thing.  That doesn't follow. It has the potential to be erased and redrawn because of that, but it is not necessary.  &gt; Oh and the whole "LOL IT DOESNT AFFECT U AT ALL!" argument is also a crock of shit. You fucking SEE it happen, you run into people who have done it, etc, ergo it affects you.  So? My reaction to two entities giving informed, mutual consent is entirely my own problem. If I decided that heterosexual marriage was abhorrent, it wouldn't give me the right to prevent it from happening.  &gt; Might as well stop trying to fight crime because the odds that YOU, out of 7 billion people, are going to get murdered in your lifetime, are as low as getting forced to marry a gay person, i.e. a chance so small you may as well say: "it doesn't affect you".  What the fucking fuck? You're seriously arguing against gay marriage on the basis that somebody may violate your human rights by forcing you into a contract you do not want, which you could exit at absolutely any time (unless somebody was threatening you or others to coerce you, in which case they're breaking the law even more than before)? Guess we'd better outlaw spoons, because somebody might force you to gouge your own eyes with one! And paper has to go. The possibility that one person might be forced to make paper-cuts on their genitalia is just too much to take!
I don't have a printer either. 
that's karma gold, someone should do this!
Expected LyraBon.   [](/lb31)[](/sp) [Got LyaraBon](http://fc07.deviantart.net/fs71/f/2011/282/0/8/and_at_last_i_see_the_light_by_why485-d4c9t7m.jpg)
I think you're pretty cool. 
I was wondering, how much did you buy them for? I was in India and picked up some but they seem to cheap to be true. It looks like the legit packs that modalert comes in, and has all the markings on the back. But i am weary.
I'm a peer advisor at UCI for social ecology. I can help you switch. 
So your mom isn't part of your dad's family?  You might want to let the cops do the thinking if this happens.
 &gt;converting from Catholicism to Christianity.  I know this is not my culture, but it blows my mind every time.
Yeah I think there are a few like that.
Oh!  For sure.  Don't jab the brake after you start moving like that.  Apply the rear before you even begin moving.  If possible, try and pre-position yourself before you stop so that you are pointing more in the direction you intend to turn as well.  Helps me at least.
ah gotchya!  I wasn't insulted or anything, just confused a bit.  
My argument is invalid now.
Well explain the back technology to him? I'm assuming the 100mb/s is a fiber or eth to door right?   Explain that those technologies prevent node overloads of yesteryear and if he wants a guaranteed speed, he would need a dedicated line from an ISP. Which those lines tend to cost well over 3k$ for month to month, let alone the cost for install.   Otherwise tell him to nut up and be happy with what he's offered.   Honestly with the SMB comcast cable lines we own, if I get a speed of anything &gt;50mb/s I'm happy with it working in proper order. Those are always easy to test if you log into the modem and check the signal db to see if it's within tolerance from distance to node. 
yeap and its bloody annoying. the newfaggotry
I remember seeing an interview with a guy who got an internship for the Daily Show, and he said he once got to eat lunch with Jon Stewart and was asked what his goals were.  He said something along the lines of "I'm trying to get into comedy writing, but the competition is insane, so I'm working on (whatever technical TV thing) instead as my main career."  Stewart responded with "Yeah, be passive about your dreams, I'm sure that will work out great."  It stuck with me.  Be a try hard.
I know this belongs more in first world problems, but holy crap, I have so many printers just gathering dust in my house.
&gt; The IMS is deadly in FFA.  God yes. The problem is that if you use assault strike package and Dead Silence as third tier perk, you're vulnerable yourself...  &gt; An aggressive player is more likely to win than a defensive player.  Yes, although the guy running headless towards the action won't win either.
By Maddox.  [Fashion tips for women from a guy who knows dick about fashion.](http://www.thebestpageintheuniverse.net/c.cgi?u=fashion)
I'm still stuck in the Infinite NA loop from the last time this was posted. :-D
I hadn't thought of a way to work her into it. I'll probably post another one of these with more references and see what happens
yesss!
Thank you! That's what's frustrating, I even asked her to just go on a tour of the local PSU campus/ consider applying and she wouldn't just because it wasn't religious.  It's honestly upsetting because I feel like.. she's holding herself back. 
[Obligatory SAP](http://www.quickmeme.com/meme/35v0tm/)
It is not. 
surely you mean "fuck waffles."
That is classy!
Did he copy that move from [Perry](http://media.reason.com/mc/mwelch/2011_09/RonPaulPerry.jpg?h=394&amp;w=600)?
I thought that dude was just doing it to make himself dumber?
There are no sources to cite where they actually invade. Just as this topic is hypothetical so would be my scenario.
